I have been waiting ever so patiently for Gadzooks to open.
I felt like that chic in the Mervyn's commercial standing at the window, saying "open, open, open.
" I drove by today and saw a parking lot FULL of cars.
I quickly pulled over and ran to the door to snag a place in line.
It was totally worth the wait.
They make the tortillas with fresh masa while you are in line, so it is totally fresh.
The meat is incredible and the sauce is so flippin' delicious.
I topped everything with pickled onions and a fried egg, my favorites.
I am a little apprehensive about this place opening though, because it is within walking distance to my house.
I can feel my wallet crying already.
I am going to be here often to try their other combos.

Day 2 of their soft open and the food was still fantastic.
The entire staff was super nice and a pleasure to interact with.
I ordered the Green Chile Pork and Short Rib Enchilada.
Super good.
House made corn tortillas were legit.
Make sure to order it Christmas style for red and green.
The lava sauce is super spicy and flavorful.
Overall an awesome new spot in Downtown PHX!

So I too have been patiently waiting for this place to open, as I drive by it daily on my way to and from work.
I have also been CRAVING Mexican food, and enchiladas and soup were top on my list to indulge in!
I understand that this was their 2nd day open, and I also agree that staff was extremely friendly and informational, the owners brother was even there helping out!
On to the food - I order for myself and another person, we got the short rib, pork verde and cheese enchilada.
Mine was topped with guacamole, his with the tomatilla salsa.
As for the enchiladas themselves, they smelled amazing, but the taste was far from it!
There was little to no flavor from the meat.
I was charged an additional $1 for the guacamole (that I wasn't told about), but the guacamole was delicious.
My friend said the tomatilla salsa was the best part of his order.
We also got some chicken tortilla soup... again, nothing special!
:( It was nothing to write home about!
Overall, I am very disappointed with the food and had extremely high expectations and was let down!!

So excited to see new restaurants moving into district 4!
Gadzooks is an amazing concept started by Aaron.
I had their pork green chile and guajillo short rib "chirstmas style" enchiladas which means a combination of the red and green sauce.
Its so cool to see them making the tortillas fresh in house and I absolutely loved their lava salsa which is so spicy but so good.
Also the homemade guac is fresh and delicious.
Cant wait to come back and try the bison.

GADZOOKS!!!
The name says it all....
I have been waiting for this place to open and have been folowing on Facebook for months and when I finally heard there was going to be a soft open/ lunch service I jumped at the opportunity to full fill my enchilada craving.
As everybody has been saying the owner Aaron was very helpful and a shorter man that had a striking resemblance to Sean Astin (the guy from Rudy/ Lord of The Rings) was also very informative about the menu.
I ate the short rib enchilada and the chicken, both took me on a one way trip straight to flavor town.
If it was winter and I was wearing socks.... they would have been blown off.
"On top" you have got to get the Guac, it cost a little extra, but trust me.... just trust me K!!
One thing I was not expecting was to see somebody hand making tortillas and asking me, "corn" or "50/50" (a half corn half flour tortilla).
Knowing full well that swimsuit season is just around the corner I decided what the heck, 50/50.... and for those of you that don't know, 50+50=100.
and those tortillas are 100% delicious.
A side of chips came in handy to scoop up the remaining guac, sauce and cheese left from my devouring of the Lada.
I cant tell you how many times I have been to a Mexican food place and the integrity of the tortilla chip was compromised with every returning dip to the salsa bowl or guac.
If the dip was the battlefield, these chips are the Sherman Tank of WW2 that plowed through the field and won the war in Europe.
After my trek trough the dip i tossed that bad boy in my mouth and all the sudden it was no longer a tank, but rather a hot air balloon, light and crisp, the perfect chip each time.
I am excited to return and try the Spinach and mushroom enchilada and the "smashed" potato enchilada.
I am not a Vegetarian but like Pokemon, I gotta catch em all!!!
I am thrilled to have a great patio spot on the way home from work to stop and grab a bite and beer before heading home to my nagging roommate.
A great addition to the local feel that CenPho is developing!!

We stopped in on a whim and we were glad we did.
This is no ordinary taco shop!
We ordered two smashed jack potato/marinated spinach & mushroom enchiladas, covered in spicy green sauce with just a touch of homemade guacamole and two orders of tortilla soup.
I went with the corn tortillas, which are thick and did not get soggy and disintegrate as soon as the sauce touched them.
The flavor of everything was outstanding and the portions were just right.
I have no need for a burrito that weighs as much as a bowling ball although I realize that for some people, more food = more value.
I will take more flavor anytime.
For the meat eaters, I noticed that they have short rib, bison, chicken, and I am sure some type of beef but I wasn't pay that close of attention to that.
The menu is simple but there is a wide variety of toppings and fillings to customize your order.
The prices are reasonable, too.
The enchiladas, soups, and three drinks came to a grand total of $20.13 and we were more than satisfied.
We will be back!

Fresh enchiladas prepared before your very eyes!
Warm, soft, tasty tortillas and bith traditional and unusual fillings and toppings, all very tasty.
We haven't found anything we don't like here.
It's a "fast food" model, but very comfortable.
Great prices.
Easy parking.

The Meal.
The lava sauce was spicy: heat and smokiness; great stuff.
The potato jack enchiladas Christmas style with Chihuahua Cheese and topped with freshly made sour cream was DELISH!
I enjoyed the oven where they heat up your clay dish holding your enchiladas; it is brilliant!
The only thing that I think could be improved upon, meal wise, is the corn tortilla itself.
The tortilla was too thick, which led to it unrolling while it was being prepared and while eating it.
I think if they were to make it just a little thinner, it would make the tortilla hold its shape better.
Service.
It's still their first week.
They were nice and ready to answer questions, but a little slow getting ready for the lunch time crowd.
It was fine, we weren't in a rush, but one thing to improve is have one person for each station.
While I was attended there were multiple people, some unsure where to go and what to do, and only a couple of people preparing the dish, which led to a bit of chaos and time delay in the kitchen side.
Ambiance.
The place was nice, clean, modern, and casual.
Love it!
Especially the light fixtures!
The patio outside was great!
Maybe one thing to consider is add a couple of those pavers from your patio exit to the north parking lot  along the gravel garden, you know to reduce people walking all over your rock and ruining the wonderful landscaping.
Portion.
The two enchilada plate did not fill the stomachs of my coworkers, nor mine, we filled our cups twice with beverage and that held us over.
One of the guys did get a three enchilada plate with a drink and that did the trick for him.

I have been watching this restaurant slowly go up since I drive by it every day after work.
The building has a very clean and modern look and so does the inside so it has caught my eye.
Since it finally opened up recently I had to go try it.
I went there last night for dinner and got the Green Chile Pork enchilada and the Short Rib enchilada.
They were both quite good, but the Short Rib enchilada was especially delicious.
I also got the guacamole on top for an extra dollar, which was given in a very generous portion and was a creamy, smooth guacamole.
There are also various toppings you can get such as pico de gallo and a creamy sour cream among other things.
I also must mention that the flour tortillas are made in the restaurant and were extremely good.
The restaurant is clearly in it's soft opening and some kinks need to be worked out with the food assembly line.
Also, since the enchiladas are put in an open fire oven in a clay-like dish, the dishes are extremely hot when you go to eat your food so beware.
Furthermore, these dishes are put on metal trays for carrying your clay dish to your table and the metal trays get a little toasty from the heat of the dish.
This could be better thought out and may not be the best way to serve these fire hot clay dishes.
I'm thinking something like a cork or wooden tray or put the clay dish in a cork holder or something of the sort.
Despite the kinks, I will definitely be going here again and will be recommending it to friends and family.

The enchiladas were AWESOME.
However I had read some reviews that the portions were small for the price and that is correct.
Basically after tax it is $7.50 for just 2 enchiladas and I would say it would take 3 enchiladas to be equal to a Chipotle burrito...maybe even 4.
I just have a hard time spending $10-$11 for 2 enchiladas, chips and guac.
So for me the food was really good but they need to make an order of enchiladas consist of 3 instead of 2 for the price they are charging.

Gadzooks is a casual place, where you order at the counter and then choose seating inside or outside on a covered patio.
The staff was very friendly, greeting us and guiding us through our first ordering experience.
The menu is short, simple, bursting with flavor and very well planned out.
Step 1: choose between 2 tacos, 2 enchiladas (or 1 each) on corn or flour tortillas made right in front of you or soup and salad.
I chose a smashed jack potato taco and a sautéed spinach mushroom enchilada, both on corn tortillas.
Step 2: red or green sauce.
The logical choice was red sauce over the enchilada and nothing over the smashed jack potato taco.
Step 3: your choice of asadero or Chihuahua cheese.
While, usually my answer to this question would be both, I opted to try only the lighter, asadero alone, so I could fully appreciate its flavor.
At this point, my beautiful concoction was placed into an open oven, where I could see the white cheese melting into delicious, gooey goodness.
Step 4: choose a salsa.
Though they all sounded delicious, salsa verdes are always my first choice.
Finally, you can pick chips and guacamole or salsa and your beverage.
We paid and made our way to a table inside.
Our food looked tasty and the presentation was nice, with the meals served in individual clay pots.
My first bite of the spinach enchilada was exploding with the flavors in the red sauce, made with dry roasted red peppers.
The mild jack and salsa verde rounded out the flavors without adding more heat.
As incredible as my enchilada was, I have to say the taco was my favorite.
The smashed jack potato filling plus the salsa verde was an even better flavor combination.
I loved the texture of the potato and the chives were a great touch too.
Morgan thoroughly enjoyed picks as well, a green chile pork enchilada with asadero cheese and green chile sauce (yeah, he really likes green chile) and a roasted tomatillo chicken enchilada with asadero and red sauce.
The guacamole was a tasty side and a local brew completed my meal.
I am thrilled that Gadzooks is in walking distance and I will definitely be back soon!

I have already eaten there four times !
The food is great.
The potatoes enchilada are amazing and I an obsessed with the pickled onions.
chips and guac are great!
Everything is freshly made every day and tortilla dough is delivered every day.
I don't mind paying a couple bucks more for fresh local food with no preservative flavoring !

I am generous with one star.
Stopped in yesterday with high hopes.

I live right down the street, so I have been watching the renovation progress for some time now.
Needless to say, I've been looking forward to this place opening up.
I was born and raised in New Mexico, so homemade Mexican food was always a staple at our house.
Let me start with saying that the food was good.
The sauces were very flavorful, and I was mostly pleased with the end product.
The experience as a whole is what was disappointing for me.
The menu....it is not your regular run-of-the-mill order the item as it reads.
You build your own meal based on many different varieties.
While the staff wasn't rude, they were not very helpful with helping the guests through the process.
Bottom line, ordering was extremely awkward.
On top of that, they were out of a few things that I would consider staples to the experience, such as corn tortillas, pico de gallo, and one of the red salsas.
I expected the whole ordering to paying time to be somewhat comparable to that of a Chipotle or Subway experience, but it took much MUCH longer...even though the restaurant was relatively empty.
My boyfriend and I ordered to go, and at the very end of it all our meals in tin containers were simply wrapped in tissue paper and string.
The cheese and sauce was all stuck to the top by the time we got home, a mere mile away.
Not to mention you couldn't stack them on top of eachother because there wasn't a more rigid surface on top of the container.
My advice would be to sell the expensive string wrapping machine, and spend a little money on some plain old take out lids.
In the end, the taste of the food was jaded by our overall experience.
I am still undecided as to whether or not to go back.
Needless to say, after months of waiting for this place to come to fruition, I was definitely disappointed with it....total bummer.

Dont bother.
We got takeout and we were dissappointed by the entire experience.
*There were about 10 people working but they all seemed to just be hanging out.
*We were ther an hour before closing and they were out of everything.
*The enchilada sauce was extremely thick and mushy *The food was cooked in a pizza oven which melted the cheese but left the insides cold * There are plenty of filling options but they are all mediocre, the quality just isnt there.
*When you order food to go they just wrap the hot open faced container with paper and string, the paper rips and sticks yo your food, you are unable to stack the containers, and your food is cold by the time you get home.
* Theres no beans!
Or rice!
Needless to say we will not be returning, we would rather have chipotle or Cafe Rio

My friend was raving about this place so we went over there together with our kids one evening.
They took her order right away, and then it was at least five minutes before they took our order.
There were five to six people behind the counter, but not much appeared to be happening.
There were two people standing directly opposite behind the counter, but they did not even say" hello", "welcome ot Gadzooks", or "be right with you".
Now, lets' talk about the menu.
Extremely confusing.
It's very unclear how to order a meal.
Additionally, there is no kids menu.
I asked if they could make my daughter a cheese quesadilla, which they were more than happy to do, but when I went to pay, I discovered that the quesadilla was the size of a small pancake, and they wanted 3.50 for it.
I told them for that price, they needed to add another quesadilla, which they did without question.
I think at Chipotle you can get an entire kids meal including quesadilla, rice, beans and drink, for about the same price.
So my suggestion would be to add a kids menu.
Okay, now for the food.
It was decent.
I ordered the spinach mushroom enchiladas with a goat cheese shmear.
I left feeling hungry.
A side of rice and beans would have been great.
I don't know if they offer that or not, but it doesn't come with the meal.
While my friend likes this place, and will probably go regularly, I doubt I will ever go back.

I'd really like to give 2 stars but I'm hoping someone reads the reviews and fixes some of the problems.
So we have been waiting patiently for this place to open...very excited to finally try it.
We get to the counter and it's very confusing and no one offers any help...except another CUSTOMER.
The employees behind the counter acted like they really didn't want to be there and how on earth could we NOT know the order process.
Felt a little irritated by that.
Anyway, the food was actually really good.
I had two enchiladas, one potato and the other spinach.
The man had a rib taco and green chile enchilada.
I tried all the sauces.
I liked my choices but I loooooved the man's even better.
Next time I go I am definitely carnivoring it up.
They were out of bison which I really wanted to try.
So next time I will know HOW to order, WHAT to order and hopefully have a more pleasant experience.

This is a pleasant addition to the area.
The food is fantastic.
Flavors of authentic mexican preparations; Roasted chile', fresh tortillas... A friendly fella preparing meals recommended I try the bison.
He even went as far as offering a sample, which i politely declined and went straight for the bison as my enchilada choice.
His sincerity while offering the meat option made me feel  that he was stoked to have it and proud to serve it.
Strong choice!!
They were phenomenal.
I'll be heading back again, without a doubt.
I didn't take note of a bike rack, however, it's certainly a place to consider for some tasty neighborhood eats.
Thanks for all of your hard work and preparation Gadzooks, you're serving up great meals.
I'll be spreading the word.

Just had the most amazingly delicious Party with a capital P, in my mouth!
First time here, but not my last!
Had the 50/50 tortillas, one pork, one chicken, green sauce, baked and bubbling to perfection, out of the oven drizzled with fresh scratch made crema, crumbled cotija cheese, and vinaigrette slaw topping it all off.
Side of hand-smashed guacamole made it complete.
Can't wait to try some secret menu items, I was made aware of tonight!
Thanks Eric!
;-)

I ate there yesterday and I think they have fixed the problems other users had below.
The menu is simple and they explained it to me as soon as I got there.
It's basically tacos, enchilades and soup.
I didn't try the soup.
You have a choice of made to order corn or flour tortillas.
Then they fill it with choice of fillings.
I highly recommend the shortrib but the green chile chicken was very good too.
Then you choose toppings like picked onions, pico de gallo, enchilada sauce, crema & cheeses.
Everything is really fresh and delicious.
I also tried the guac which was fantastic.
The entrees are less than $7, so you can actually eat lunch for under $10, which is great.
The concept seems similar to, but a step above, Chipotle.
In fact, I liked it so much that I was craving it and actually went back again today.
The employees both days were very helpful and asked if I'd had a good experience.
Frankly, it was an excellent lunch and I have no complaints.
I will go there often.
If you had a bad experience, I think it is worth a second chance!

Amazing food.
Have been wanting to go here since it opened.
Cool design, lots of room, and awesome food.
Very busy but worth the wait.
I want to try everything on their menu.
Go nuts and get all the toppings...its worth it.
Finally the modern enchilada has arrived!!

This place is great.
They are doing a great job considering they haven't even had their grand opening yet!
Food is delicious, staff is helpful and nice and they all really want to know how to make everything better and are actively working on it.
I did not find the menu confusing, you choose your tortilla, filling, cheese sauce and topping ... not hard.
Keep it up!
You're doing a great job and you can only get better from here :)

Stopped by yesterday for some carry out to heat up later.
Have to say the short ribs were amazing, the chicken was great, and the pork just OK.
Topped Christmas style b/c the Hub prefers red sauce to my green - but this time we both switched teams.
I found the red to be smooth, smokey, and complex - while the green was grainy and piquant with less kick than advertised - but he loved it.
Liked the combo corn/flour tortilla the kid behind the counter recommended.
Have to say at 4:30, the product in line pans were looking a little tired.
Be nice if they were scraped down and cleaned up.
Felt like it was lunch leftovers before the night rush.
Which, at the proper temp is NP, it's just a mental/marketing thing...  Hey did anyone notice SOUP?
Totally missed it in the 'experience'.
Next time.

I came in because I saw soups on the sign but I didn't see any offered inside, kind of a buzz kill.
As far as the enchilada goes I found it to be tasty and inventive dish but it kind of loses it's appeal when it is assembled like a Pontiac.
But when these things come out of the paint booth the perfectly browned cheese is quite attractive and then you can customize the exterior to your tastes.
The only main enchilada ingredient they offered that I really had any interest in was the buffalo.
Since I had already decided to blow my entire non-dairy, no-animal thing I thought bison does bring nutritional benefit and hay, if I'm gonna cheese it up, may as well go all in.
So no soup, no bison, I'm bummed.
I ended up splitting two enchiladas, one potato and a spinach-mushroom, both were a good choice.
The food is good but I wish they had some salt shakers on the table.
The guy saucing our enchiladas was making a big deal about the heat from the habenero sauce and I said, pile it on but after tasting it I can't see why it couldn't second as a cooling salve for heat rash.
Again, salt shakers would wake it up but admire and applaud their season to tastability product that can let the diner make it perfect.
All the ingredients are fresh and tasty, even the hab sauce.
Too bad they can't come up with a sliced jicama enchilada in lieu of tortillas for those of us wanting to get our veg freak on.
As far as the meats, two high school kids thought they were the best they had ever had, maybe it's a kid thing.

Overall my experience at Gadzooks was a dissappointment.
I had been excited to try this place for months.
First, the customer experience is extremely lacking.
The place was so quiet.
There was no music, no tvs; just the awkward sound of echoing conversation from the other patrons.
Not the worst thing ever though.
I stared at the menu for at least five minutes before any aknowledgement.
Then, the only words from behind the counter were "what are you getting?
" For a new place, a little helpful guidance or possibly some explaination would be great.
Especially when the have several types of tortillas, meats, cheeses and sauces.
I don't really know what I want yet, because I don't understand whats going on yet.
everone was grumpy, except the gal at the cash register.
;/  Presentation was not great either.
The ceramic dishes wer nice, sturdy and cooled quickly.
The to-go packaging was really neat as well.
What wasn't neat, was the soup dish.
It was a cup.
Like, a paper cup that you put a fountain soda in.
Uh... that seems pretty ratchet.
no soup bowls, or paper soup cups?
Also, the food along the toppings line was just sitting in an empty steam/cooling table in what looked like storage containers.
Also, they only have 2, very small trash cans that were almost un-noticeable.
Napkins, straws, silverware: all seemingly happhazardly thrown in a divider next to the fountain.Did they rush to open so quick, that they cut a few corners?
It defintiely seems like it.
They probably should have waited another month, so that customers would have a genuine "WOW' experience.
Next was the food.
Simply put, I didn't like it.
I can admit that the reason for this was no fault of the establishment, but my own personal tastes.
It just wasn't my type.
They definitely have some decent options but they were missing an obvious staple.
BEEF!
At least, I didn't see any, and as I stated earlier, the employees were less than helpful, so if there was a beef option with a zany nickname, I had no idea.
The tortillas were either corn, or a corn/flour hybrid.
I prefer flour, so they werent my favorite.
The rating i am giving here is based 90% on my experience, not so much the food.
Final thought: After much built-up anticipation, I was underwhelmed when I got in, and left feeling hungry and frustrated.
Hopefully, in a few months when I give it another shot, some noticeble customer service improvmnets will have been made.

Now that enchiladas have become my preferred regional dish, when I read about this place I knew I had to try it ASAP.
Gadzooks has a very lively vibe about it, from the cool layout of the building to the enthusiasm of the staff.
I tried two of their enchiladas: guajillo braised short ribs and sauteed spinach mushroom, with "Christmas" style sauces (red and green sauces), topped with asadero and chihuahua cheeses and a side of pico salsa.
Both enchiladas were excellent, especially the short ribs one - so good I wish I got an extra one.
And I could have (you could "add a lada" for 2 bucks more), but it turns out it's a good thing I didn't because I also ordered Linda's homemade tortilla soup - it was really tasty, and I had it topped with potatoes and crema.
The soup was so hearty that it could be a light meal by itself; no wonder it was listed as a main dish and not a side.
I would suggest to them, though, that they serve the soup in a bowl rather than in the tall cup that they use.
I wish the folks here well and hope for their success.
This is a very welcome addition to the central corridor of the city.

So my first impression was that this was a yuppie urban Chipotle's only more confusing since the menu was written over head instead of behind the servers which is ten times easier.
BUT, the beef short rib enchilada was SO good and the choices of toppings (cheeses, vegies, etc) were SO much better.
And they top it off by baking it in a cute little clay dish in the oven.
It was YUMMY!
The chips, however....much better at Chipotles.
I will definitely go back for lunch soon and try some of the other interesting dishes...probably not for dinner.

I like the location but the food leaves much to be desired.
The food was bland and the service was mediocre.
I would urge you to spare yourself the disappointment.

Good stuff, the menu is a bit of a cluster so it can be confusing your first visit--this is complicated by the cutesy names for items that are not quite as straight-forward to us laymen as the restaurant thinks.
Also, when my husband and I arrived, I believe the owner (?
) was sitting outside with some younger looking guys drinking beer/Starbucks that gave off the impression that they were just jacking around.
When we walked up, they kind of obnoxiously called to us and I thought it was just a bunch of college kids with nothing else to do (those were the days, I was doing that myself no too long ago, enjoy it while you can!).
Kind of off-putting because it's not professional to drink on duty even if it is your place and confuses you about what type of crowd this place is going for, i.e, is this a family place, foodie place, or a hang out for people drinking beer on a Sunday afternoon?
In any event, I ordered one chicken and one rib enchilada which were heated in the same dish.
I went with more or less all the fixings since this was my first visit and couldn't make up my mind.
Everything was tasty and fresh, my only complaint is that the guacamole was under seasoned.
Regardless, I will definitely be back, it is nice to have another new place in the neighborhood, especially considering that Merriam's (the shop that previously occupied the space) has been vacant for years.
I believe the menu will appeal to both foodies and families and I wish Gadzooks success.
Try it, it's good,

Wonderful food fresh and flavorful.
Watch out Chipotle this new kid on the block is going to give you a run for your money.
The tortillas are made from scratch in front of you and you build your choice of street tacos or enchiladas or one of each.
They are in a building that once housed a dress shop so there is a surprise when your to go order is presented.
I recommend this.

Great place for lunch or a lite dinner.
The service is great and friendly staff.
My only complaint was the giant menu written high up on the wall, it puts a strain on your neck.

I work across the street from Gadzooks and waited for it to open for what seemed like forever.
I just got a chance to try it today.
The staff greeted me right away and could tell I had never been (i assume) they explained how everything worked to make my 1st time easy.
The process was not hard at all unless you can't make up your mind what you like.
They do have many choices which can seem overwhelming, but I was brave and decided quickly.
I got the braised ribs and green chille pork enchiladas with the christmas sauce and tried a little of all of the cheeses.
They topped everything and melted it together in the wood oven.
I have to say that I very much enjoyed it and was a great experience.
The food was very good and the place is very nice and clean.
Will be going back for sure.

It's good.
It's like "...a Chipotle for enchiladas"  (which brings up the question, why doesn't Chipotle do enchiladas?
)  It's just not a bargain.
I got two enchiladas, one bison, one green chili chicken.
With a drink, it was $9.
The bison was a whole lot of nothing.
Carolinas puts out a better machaca beef enchilada for, I think, $2.75.
The green chili chicken was delicious and had a nice zing to it.
And the "Lava" hot sauce was EVERYTHING IT SHOULD BE!
Flavorful, spicey, excellent.
What DID look REALLY delicious were the chopped salads.
Alright, "a" chopped salad, meaning the guy in front of me.
They piled everything for the salad in an enchilada bowl, dramatically dumped it out on a chopping board and then chopped it in front of you.
I saw this guy, the guy in front of me in line, on his way out the door, and I asked him, "was it as good as it looked?
"    "Better", he said.
"Friggin' GREAT salad!
Also, not inexpensive.
And by the way, "half a spoon" of guacamole, for $1, sucks.
I know avocados are expensive, but it's not worth it.

It's not that often that I try a new place and love it so much I tell everyone I know all about it.
Gadzooks is one of those places.
Being a "foody" (self-described anyway), it's also not that often that I go to the same place multiple times over a short period of time.
Gadzooks is also one of those places.
As of last night, I have been there 5 times in two weeks.
Maybe I'm forgetful or flakey or whatever the case maybe, but there are many times that I've tried something and loved it but by the time I get home I've forgotten about it.
Not that I would call that meal forgettable, but because I am usually always on the go and  always thinking about what's next.
This was not the case this time.
I was texting my mom and boyfriend while I was stuffing my face, the next day at work I was telling everyone about how good everything was.
I had wanted to try Gadzooks before it even opened.
I knew nothing about it, just seemed interesting and fun.
So I finally get to try it and everything was so tasty.
I was definitely not disappointed!
Everything just has so much flavor, and the perfect textures... What I was really impressed is that regardless of which meat or vegetarian option I got, or if I got red or green sauce (or both), or which of the three cheeses or 2 sauces I got, everything went so well together.You can't really make a mistake when building your enchilada (or tacos or whatever you get).
It just all works.
The staff has always been friendly and not afraid to give their two cents when asked.
The prices are fair.
I paid just over $9 last night for two enchiladas and two pumpkin cookies, I have not one complaint about Gadzooks and am already excited about my next visit!

Excellent!
Had the green chili pork enchiladas and was not disappointed !
Friendly staff, great atmosphere !

I didn't know what to expect, went in with an open mind, and I was pleasantly surprised.
The meats are cooked extremely well, you can choose what else you want with your dish, the staff are very patient and very informative, they really know what and how the items are executed.
It is clean and a true great experience with a very reasonable price.
A great place!!
Definitely will come back....

This place has a Chipotle type ordering system but the flavors and unique style of making the dish is absolutely great.
I tried the two enchilada plus a lada for 2$ more.
So I tried the chicken, pork and bison.. All very moist and flavorful.
Topped them with cotija cheese sour cream and guacomole..I thought the prices are adequate.
I highly recommend this place.

Two things,First  I will NEVER understand a restaurant when you tell them "it's my first time here" and it just flies by their head.
Please, check back, "did you like the food?
" "Come back.
" "Here is a sample of something you didn't try.
" Nada!
Off my soapbox.
Ok, if your a Mexican food place the spicy thing on your menu should not be the potatoes.
Food was very bland, mushy, and seemed to have been sitting there awhile.
Comparisons to chipotle for ambiance are accurate.
I will go back in a few months to see if its gotten better, it's a great concept.
Side note: upon walking up, you are smacked in the face with the smell of fish.
It's from a pond nearby, come mid summer it's going to STINK!

Eat here!
Bring your family and friends here!
My husband would make fun of the concept of an enchilada place as we drove by, but one I night I said we were eating there anyway and he loved the food as much as I did!
I've had both the chicken and the beef and both were delicious.
Green sauce recommended!
I've heard from others I have taken that the spinach and mushroom filling is even better than the beef.
Only issue is the line can get a bit backed up with all the options they have and people going in their first time.
It would be great if they could also put some guidance as to the options on the glass between the customers and the enchiladistas so you didn't have to keep stepping back and looking up.
I plan on going back at least weekly...and I don't think my husband will mind either :)

The enchiladas were really good but the tortilla soup was just ok.
I took my kid who is 7 and we had a little trouble finding something for her to eat.
The gal behind encounter was very accommodating and made her something that she wanted.
We'll go again.

A spicy 3.5 stars!
A good value and locally owned venture in central Phoenix.
Stopped in and tackled some tacos to go.
There was a wide variety of meat and veggie options.
Sampled the Short rib and Chile-pork tacos that both had a little zip to them.
The chicken tacos are the safest bet on the spicy barometer, but still flavorful.
The homemade flour/corn tortillas are a nice touch.
I'd take the staff up on the offer to melt the cheese in the wood fire stove as our food was a little cold when we got home.
I'll definitely go back to try some different combinations of meats and homemade salsas.
(Referring To-Go order) It seems that the packaging is a little over the top and wasteful - although beautifully done.
The food is served up in a circular aluminum foil pan, typical for Mexican fare, and then slid into an orange square sleeve for marketing purposes.
We had two dishes so they were then stuffed into a Spanish Inquisition styled contraption that then binds the two packages together.
While fun to watch the first time, it does slow down the line, then is annoying to cut off when you're to your destination and ready to scarf down.
All in all, I'd rather save the trees and the 45 seconds it takes to wrap them.
(Perhaps change the packaging for the tacos as they we soggy when we got home)  The interior/exterior of the building are very contemporary, which adds to the allure of wanting to sit and have a beer with your meal.
It makes a great alternative to Chipotle and your dollars stay local.
A few fine tweaks and it could easily be a 5 star experience:)

I haven't heard the exclamation, "Gadzooks!
" since watching an English drawing room comedy on TCM during Alec Guinness Week or something equally British and old timey.
It's a great exclamation.
Like, "Zounds!
" or "Sacré Bleu!
" or "Bollocks!
" Things Americans don't say.
We usually just say the "F" word.
So when we checked out the newly renovated and freshly opened "Gadzooks: Enchiladas & Soup" in a 40-year-old building that was originally a filling station, then Miriam's Designer Clothes (FYI: Miriam was not on Project Runway), we naturally said, "Gadzooks!
There's a new restaurant in town!
" When we tried it out, we said, "The F-word!
These are darn good!
"  Dang!
I mean, who doesn't love a great enchilada, right?
We feel a little territorial about things like enchiladas here in the Southwest, too, because we do them so well.
Cincinnati may have its Skyline Chili.
New Orleans has its jambalaya.
Coney Island has its hot dogs.
We've got amazing Mexican food here.
Oy!
So when cute, scruffy, friendly owner Aaron Pool graduated from ASU he followed his dream: he opened an 'Enchiladeria,' let's call it.
But Aaron's vision is unique: you can customize what's really a genuinely handmade enchilada with a variety of fillings, toppings, sauces and condiments.
When Aaron had this, "A ha!
" moment he said, "Gadzooks!
" The rest, as they say, is history.
Gosh!
Once you enter Aaron's clean, bright, airy "enchiladeria" you'll see the menu posted above the friendly assembly line where someone like the totes adorbs inky Eric will help you navigate your way through 'Lada Land.
You'll see the fresh tortillas being pressed right before your very eyes.
Choose either corn or the half 'n' half corn & flour tortilla.
They're thick, fluffy; big on texture and taste.
If you're not in an enchilada mood, try a street taco.
You'll get two of either, and stuff 'em with something like Roasted Tomatillo Chicken, Green Chile Pork Shoulder, Guajillo Braised Short Ribs, the melt-in-your-mouth Modelo Braised Bison, or other succulent stuffings.
I happen to be a fan of the Sauteed Spinach Mushroom, too.
Aaron's up with the "pollos" preparing the succulent viands at 4 a.m. No kidding!
Boo-ya!
Smother it!
Pick your sauce, pardner!
Red, Green or "Christmas" style with both.
They pop these comidas into a stone oven, and you get it piping hot.
Zoinks!
You've also got time to add salsa-- and they've got four to choose from.
Mix 'n' match!
Top it with scratch-made crema (a smooth, Mexican sour cream), cotija cheese, a crunchy, crisp cole slaw (we think it's fierce) and for a dollar more add sharp & creamy goat cheese, a griddle-fried egg or hand-smashed guacamole that's already rumored to be gaining a tasty reputation.
Through the miracle of math, they've determined that there are 2,638,594 different combinations available.
You won't get bored, believe me.
You can even get a box of six enchiladas or tacos for $15 each to perk up your party.
Talk about a bargain!
¡Ay karamba!
Now you've got yourself a pair of fine enchiladas or tacos, señors y señoritas!
A pair is right around the $6.75 mark and you can add a third for only $2 more.
Hey!
Prefer something lighter"?
Opt for a customizable, freshly chopped salad for $6.75.
Feeling carnivorous?
Add some meat for about two bits or so.
Dang!
Soup is given short-shrift here with only one to choose from.
(We hoped the "soup" might be plural.
It isn't.
) It's a dilly, however.
It's Linda's (that's Aaron's frequently on-site mom) who offers up a delicious housemade Tortilla Soup for $3.95.
We can't help but wish it came in a bowl, however, instead of a paper "to-go"- style cup.
¡Olé!
If you really want a fiesta, try their 7th Street Sangria, Osborn Oro Margarita for $4 each, or a cool cerveza.
That means, "beer.
" Currently "piped in," we're hoping they'll start brewing their ice tea, soon.
Hint, hint.
Gadzooks!
And that, amigos, is what they call, "the whole enchilada.
" You might even say the "F" word after you try 'em.

Take Chipotle and, cross it with wood-fired pizza minus the pizza, add your own personal twist then throw in some out of the ordinary choices (bison tacos, anyone?
) and voila, Gadzooks.
You get to choose from soup, tacos or enchiladas and pick out your choice of meats and cheeses.
After they stick it in the oven to get it all melty and toasty you add on veggies and our salas, perhaps grab and beer and your done.
I came not too long after it opened and it took a while to get my order in.
A lot of that had to do with that fact that none of us really knew what our choices were.
The menus aren't that clear so I found  myself guessing up to the last minute before making a rush decision as to not hold up the line any more.
It was a little haphazard behind the counter as well because the staff didn't quite seem to know what was going on or what they were supposed to do.
It was like a poor assembly line that went horribly slow to suddenly speed up.
It was like watching Lucy and Ethel make enchiladas.
Once i got my order though the meat was tender and delicious and I really enjoyed it.
I would probably go just a little less melty next time.
I think I need to go a few more times and become more acquainted with the menu I'm sure I'll like it even more.
I'm sure too that by now that staff are more experienced and running like a well-oiled machine.

It's a nice clean place with good food and a friendly staff.
Do it!

This place is totally amazing.
They figured out how to make enchiladas not only fun and cool...but absolutely delicious.
The meat selection is awesome...and the tortillas are incredible.
Highly recommend.
You will be back.

Quirkly good...
Aligned with other reviews, it is similar to a Chipotle, but with enchiladas as the main fare.
The ordering process is a bit clumsy, but the results are darn good.
I opted for a mix of veggies enchiladas - smashed potatoes, spinach, etc..
They are hand rolled and topped with the sauce of your choice.
They add a few options - cheese, pico, etc.. that you can choose from.
The end result was top notch.
Spicy, but not overpowering.
Hot, but not so burning hot that I could not eat it immediately.
The chips was really good as well.
Stop in, piece together enchiladas your style, pop a squat and enjoy.
I will be back....

Pretty good lunch.
I ordered two enchiladas and tortilla soup.
I filled my enchiladas with bison and pork and chose the "hybrid" tortilla.
Everything was good, but nothing to write home about.

Went back to give it another shot (now that we had experience ordering).
I really wanted to try the bison which was out the first time.
Now the bison is only available at lunch...huh?!?!?!!
This time was total opposite...the food was not very good but the service was really great.
I had the potato enchilada and the chicken enchilada...pieces of the chicken were almost inedible, almost like they mixed overcooked, old chicken in with new chicken that was cooked OK.
The chicken alone ruined the whole meal.
There's a slim chance I would give it another shot, but with that chicken and now bison only at lunch...probably not.

Wow, what a  solid enchilada!
It's kind of Chipotle style where you pick your meats and toppings and sauces etc, but way better quality.
i went with the braised short rib, took  both red and green sauce and had them top it off with a fried egg.
If that's not enchilada porn to you, we can't be friends.
all in all, soild food at a great price!

I've been watching this place under construction for a while, and was glad to have the opportunity to pick up a late lunch to go today.
I wanted to try a variety of their options, so I got a 2 enchilada plate with chicken with green sauce and short rib with red sauce, as well as an order of chips with hot salsa on the side.
The food was fantastic.
I was a little skeptical of how they were going to pull off the cheese part in a to go order (my favorite part of enchiladas is the melted cheese on top!
) but by putting the enchiladas in the oven right in a foil to go dish, the cheese was melted perfectly!
Both meats were tasty and high quality, and the sauces were savory and amazing.
The chips were clearly homemade and the salsa was plenty spicy but also flavorful.
I took off one star for an ambiance issue - it was SO loud in there with all of the stone/metal surfaces that it was hard to hear and speak to the line cooks to place my order without shouting and leaning a bit toward/over the super high glass partition.
A little bit of insulation for noise reduction would do wonders.
I can't wait to go back and try the cornbread and mashed potato enchiladas, as well as the chicken tortilla soup!

This is a very fun, creative, and healthy way to enjoy enchiladas.
While the setup does have a Chipotle-type feel, the ingredients are more unique.
I especially liked the oven element to warm your tasty enchilada.
My biggest complaint, there was not enough parking and seating was a challenge.
Notwithstanding, I will go back!

Tried the salad and 2 enchiladas.
Was very good, thought it was good value for money.
Ordering was a bit strange but I thought the servers tried to explain how to do it.
It is a bit noisy inside though, if not, good experience and would recommend.

The enchiladas are unparalleled.
Quick and easy service with lots of options.
An upscale Chipotle.

I'm a pretty big fan of this place.
Yes the ordering can be a little time consuming, but when you consider that by the time you reach the end of the line, you are handed over a freshly baked casserole chocked full of yummy goodness, it sort of makes up for it all.
So there are a few things you should know when ordering.
1) You can get nachos.
They're not on the board, but they will make them up and they are delish (and big).
2) The soup is awesome.
I wish they offered more than one size but it is tasty and built to your tastes, just like everything else.
3) The spicy cornbread filling should be nominated for its own food group.
This is seriously the best thing that I have tasted in a really long time.
4) The grapefruit margarita is fantastic.
Perfectly crisp and refreshing for our super-hot summer days, do yourself a favor and get one or two (or three).
5) The pumpkin cookies with touch of caramel frosting is a must have.
It is the optimal ending for the meal and since it's not heavy, it's a great topper.
The staff is friendly.
The space is clean.
The food is fantastic.
Yep, I'm a pretty big fan!

Simply amazing.the food was so God, and the service was perfect.
5 stars all the way.

Gadzooks is a new taco joint in the Phoenix area, only their main staple is enchiladas not tacos.
Sorta like Chipotle, but different.
Overall, the good was pretty good but heavy for lunch.
The issue this with Gadzooks is the choices, simply way too many of them.
I counted a total of 7 distinct choices you need to make to get your enchilada, And halfway through the process, they pop it in the oven to heat.
This maybe viewed as a positive by some, but not me.
Why, takes too long to get your food!
Long story short, decent food but the long wait will keep me away.

was not sure what to expect...but, it was fantastic.
Some great choices and fresh ingredients.

I have no problem with choices, I happen to like them.
Yes, there are a lot of items to choose from but the staff is happy to have you taste sauces and such to make sure you get what you like.
I found the staff friendly and very accommodating and willing to explain how everything is prepared and how everything works.
I especially liked the beef short rib filling.
It was delicious and melts in  your mouth.
I thought the chips were a bit greasy and weren't really needed with the filling enchiladas so I will probably skip that next time.
I also think I added too much to my enchiladas and so I couldn't taste everything distinctly.
But that's my problem.
My one problem is that the place is called Enchiladas and Soup.
I was really hoping to try both.
Why not offer a one enchilada/cup of soup combo?

Comparing to Chipotle?
Sure, similar atmosphere.
Food?
Waaay better and truly delicious - after I had the enchiladas, I had to try the rib taco, which was awesome.
Value?
Some reviews say it's pricey, but these same people ought to call Chipotle pricey as well, since they are in the same ballpark.
Personally, I thought it was a good value, especially considering how tasty it was and some of the options available.
As far as service goes, I think they must have kicked into gear, because the counter people were friendly and helpful.
Every new business has its growing pains and maybe that is what a few reviewers experienced a few months ago, but I was personally very satisfied with this place, and glad I tried it.
Definitely will be returning soon.
Side note - to the person that said $1 for guacamole was too much - I hope you realize it's $1.80 extra at Chipotle, and try to make your own guac for cheaper...people do have to make some kind of profit, whatever measly amount they get from your $1.

My friend and I really wanted to try Gadzooks.
So, we finally went last week for lunch.
It is a cute little place off of 7th street & Osborn.
The downside on this place is that the parking is really small.
The cool thing about this place is that they make your food right in front of you.
Also it is like a chipotle, but they sell enchiladas.
I got two enchiladas, one with chicken and the other one with short ribs with red and green sauce.
They even put a fried egg on top of it.
OMG it was really good.
So, if you are looking for a place to go for quick and great food.
You should totally go here.

Oh dear GOD!
This place is so amazing.
I seriously don't know how the lines aren't out the door and around the corner!
My sister lives nearby and she demanded that we try it.
Boy, was she right when she said it's like an orgasm in your mouth!
Can you say QUALITY?!?!
I feel like this is what I expected at Gallo Blanco but was disappointed.
First of all, the tortillas are extremely fresh; considering they start with a ball of dough and flatten/cook it right on the grill in your face!!
The three of us shared 4 tacos, 2 pork and 2 beef, half corn/half flour, with red AND green sauce; plus an enchillada with a fried egg on top!!
I literally could not stop eating.
We somehow stopped ourselves from being super fatkids and took home some leftovers (portions are pretty generous).
Still superb as a leftover btw.
The staff was super nice, can't wait to come back!

Gazooks, Gazooks, Gazooks - I wanted to like you, I really did.
Enchiladas and soup - interesting concept though mysteriously, I found only one soup on the menu upon arrival.
Yes sir, I was greeted by a single lonely Tortilla soup but yet the "soup" part somehow snug into the restaurant's naming convention.
And while on the topic of corn, please know that asking your staff if the corn was organic was akin to asking "what is the meaning of life?
" It required pondering so deep that I was unlikely to get an answer in this lifetime.
So I resigned myself to my GMO corn maza and headed past some dried out looking fillings (was that mashed potatoes I saw??
) for the toppings...still hopeful.
What an  impressive array indeed.
There is not much I don't like about Pico de Gallo, except maybe for someone fishing for the spoon in its deepest depths.
Glove or no glove, I'm not a fan of anything that requires being buried wrist deep.
Call it a personal preference.
I finally sat down in the noisy room amongst my fellow starved and desperate cubicle dwellers.
Upon first bite,  I suddenly understood the importance of the topping selection.
You see, without the addition of every creamy substance known to man, your enchiladas are regretfully forgettable.
The overall concept strikes me as an interesting cross of Chipotle and Subway - just minus flavorful food, but with the general poor training of Subway staff.
So Gazooks, we are not a match.
It's me, not you.
(Disclaimer: The aforementioned phrase is designed to maintain your self-esteem while really expressing that  it is, in fact, you.

Love this place!
The staff is really friendly and there are vegan/raw options.
I ordered the spinach and mushroom enchiladas (no cheese) and I was impressed!
It's hard to make enchiladas taste good without cheese, but the house-made salsas and guacamole did the trick.
I'm glad to find another cool local restaurant, I will totally come back.

I really appreciate it when a restaurant takes a simple concept and runs with it.
There's no need to overcomplicate the menu if done right, and my friends, Gadzooks is a shining example of that.
The menu is straightforward, enchiladas and soup.
Enchiladas are prepped Chipotle style, by which I mean, you go down a line adding fillings/toppings to customize your 'ladas.
If you know how your taste buds work, you shouldn't have a problem putting together a winning combination!
This is especially true because everything is tasty.
I've had the pleasure of trying the chicken, spare rib, pork, and bison (only served at lunch), and all left me craving more.
My two favorites are probably the bison and the chicken though.
As far as other ingredients to add, there's a great variety.
Fresh veggies, salsas, sauces, guacamole, and even housemade crema set a definitive line between eating here and eating at your favorite Mexican hole-in-the-wall.
Oh, and wasn't there something about soups?
Nope.
Soup.
Gadzooks has one, it's tortilla; it sits in a huge pot on the stove intensifying and enhancing its flavors as the day goes on.
Add some chicken to it, top it with some cheese, and send me a compliment about it later.
I personally can't say no to the stuff.
Gadzooks is one of my new favorite spots.
With great service, consistent quality, and delicious food, this simple concept could be all over the valley in no time.
I am very pleased to have it in the neighborhood.

I went during their opening week and despite the obvious challenges they faced while learning a new restaurant and concept and staff I went back because the food is off the hook good and cheap as hell.
Both times I got the half and half tortillas, I like the softness of the masa.
I also got the chicken and short rib.
The chicken is light and flavorful, the short rib is hearty and savory and smoky.
I chose the "Christmas" sauce, half red, half green.
the green is fruity, light and refreshing while the red is super smoky and hearty.
I like the red better and need to remind myself for next time but the two together make a nice contrast.
I got the cheddar cheese and then the guac and pico with the habanero on the side, its hot, and I mean hot.
What I think is hot most people cannot eat.
To me the habanero is edible but if you use too much you could ruin the meal.
My friend got the chicken and the mushroom and loved both.
He also tried the jalapeno ranch dressing and it was awesome ( I stole some).
The first time we visited was their opening week and the wait was tough, the food ran out, the staff was over their heads.
This time the wait was non existent, the food plentiful and fresh and the staff orderly and efficient.
What a difference a few months made!!
Some people complain of "chipotle with enchiladas", and the resemblance is there in the production line and the mexican flavor but thats where it ends.
With the huge amount of choices and customization as well as the food being 10x as flavorful this is the clear winner.
The food is as flavorful as Richardsons or Barrio Cafe.
no joke.
I am glad to see they worked out the bugs.
Eat here.
Again and again.

I hardly ever take the time to write out a review, but this experience could not go ignored.
I would  have much rather spent my hard earned money elsewhere.
The glass that separates you and the ordering counter must make it hard for them to hear, I had to repeat myself constantly.
It would've been helpful to have been told that from the get go instead of figuring it out at the end.
I asked for a sample of the chicken because I've never been and was having a hard time ordering, the guy looked at me like I was stupid for asking.
I pointed at little plastic containers they had by the meat and said that they must obviously give samples.
He finally let me try a bit.
It was a big ordeal to find out how long of a wait it was for the green chile pork to come out.
I had to ask him like 4  different times if he would just make one with the little bit that was left.
He acted annoyed for having to scoop out the meat that was left because it required a bit more effort.
The lady at the checkout was rude when I asked if I could pay while I waited for it to finish cooking.
She ignored us until I asked for drink cups.
All in all, the food was ok (the tortilla soup was a massive disappointment, they don't even put tortilla in it.
Don't order it if you are a fan of tortilla soup, the flavor was off), the service sucks and the line is a cluster f***k. At least chipotle has an efficient and friendly assembly line.
I will not be returning.
Much better places to support in the area.

Really flavorful.
Fun experience to really personalize my food, which is nice because i'm picky.
The staff was eager to let me sample.
I didn't think i would ever be interested in having a cornbread filling, but i'll have to do that next because it was amazing!
I ordered two enchiladas: one pork and one chicken, with the red sauce.
I think next time i'll have get the fried egg, because the sauce and pork were so dark a flavor that it needed it to smooth it out for my tastes.
(I fried my own egg to go with my left overs, yum)   I think for a local small start-up business to expect them to have the multitude of ingredient available all the time, is a lot to expect.
They had everything there for us to try!
The menu was a little confusing only in that i didn't know why they listed salad dressings like they might apply to an enchilada, and it would have been nice if there were little signs labeling what all the ingredients were on the glass.
It also would have been helpful to have paper menus to grab and step aside to read over.
I felt uncomfortable standing next to a table of customers eating to read the menu so that others could go ahead of me.
I don't have the best hearing, but did okay talking through the glass and wide counter.

I finally got to try this new neighborhood joint.
It was GREAT.
The staff was enthusiastic and gracious, the price was reasonable (even a bit low given the quality of the food), and the food was fantastic.
Hand-crafted tortillas, custom-built, fire baked enchiladas with a multitude of fillings, amazing sauces, and killer soup means I will be back.
I had 2 enchiladas with spinach-mushroom filling, the smoky red sauce, and topped with pickled onions, slaw, and 3-chile vinaigrette.
I also had soup with no meat and added a dollop of super-flavorful mashed potatoes.
If you go right at noon on a weekday, expect the lunch crowd crush to make parking and eating in a challenge.
I got there at 11:45 and had no trouble.
If I were trying to grab a quick lunch with a friend during work, I would probably be prepared to send one person in to place a to-go order while the other person drives around the block.
Support this little gem.
The building has been empty for so long, and I hear rumor that a Qdoba or ZTejas is being built right across the street.
It is up to the locals to keep local options alive!
PS please consider adding packs of a dozen tortillas to go to your menu.
I would definitely buy them to have at home.

The ordering process is a bit confusing and when we told them it was our very first visit and we needed help knowing the order process they still didn't make it very clear what all the options were.
Oh well, we eventually sorted it out.
And the other reviewer said that the menu board is poorly placed was SPOT ON.
As it is you have to stand back several feet to read it and then walk up to the counter to order.
It's awkward because right after you walk in the employees are asking you if they can help you, but if you are a 'first timer' then you are probably still standing 10 feet away looking straight upwards trying to decipher the menu and options.
It makes everything seem rushed and confusing.
I ordered the tortilla soup and it was lukewarm as soon as took one spoonful of it.
I had to go straight back and ask the cashier to please have someone put it in the oven and heat it up, and afterwards it was delivered back to our table by a sullen employee who seemed offended that I asked them to heat up my room temperature soup.
No apologies, nothing.
(Seriously, I don't think the flame was even on under the soup pan on their stove, it was that chilled.
)    My husband's food looked better and was piping hot because they actually put it into their wood brick oven before he got it.
He liked his food a lot, I did NOT like mine at all.
To be completely honest, even if my soup had been served at a normal temperature it was bland, with very little definition or texture (aside from mush) and almost no zip.
We both LOVED their chips and salsa though.
Delicious!
Well probably be back to try them one more time as I really want these guys to succeed because I live right down the street and I love their concept, but if I get another room temperature bowl of soup it'll definitely be a MAJOR issue.

So disappointed since it's in my neighborhood.
Interesting format but sloppy and disorganized assembly line.
All the meats were super spicy, which paired with salsa, was way too hot.
The tortilla soup remnants we had had NO TORTILLA, if there's no tortilla, its not tortilla soup!
/end.
The cookies were the highlight of the meal.
Now, they also have HORRENDOUS customer service!
First off, no ice.
I am so irritated that I will not come back again and will tell anyone who will listen how rude the blond cashier was.
My sister had accidentally spilled our soup all over her hands and on the floor.
No big deal, but not a single napkin in sight.
When we asked for some, she returned with a wad of brown paper towels and then completely ignored us.
Not a single staff member offered to replace our spilled soups or came to clean it up, just kept moving along as if they expected us to clean up the soup ourselves.
I hate to think that it was a race thing, but their behavior was completely suspect.
The manager came up to her to ask what happened, nodded, then returned to the assembly line.
When I asked for a drink, she said there's no ice.
But when she rung up this lovely young white couple, she said that they were making more and would bring it to them.
WTF, I guess they don't want us black folks eating there.
P.S.
This place doesn't hold a candle next to Barrio Cafe or Richardson's, what a joke.

We were so stoked to give this place a try, but we were seriously disappointed.
A good concept and well-braised meats were not enough to compensate for the main sauces (red and green) falling flat.
The red sauce was especially awful... bitter and I found it ruined the whole dish.
The green sauce needed salt and lacked real flavor.
Individual components were well executed, but the sauces literally destroyed the whole meal and I couldn't finish mine, despite attempting to scrape the sauce off.
I would absolutely come back if the chef modified his main recipes as this neighborhood spot is loaded with potential.

Just like Chipotle, but better!
Try the tortilla soup or the enchiladas!

It has a Chipotle vibe but instead of burritos they specialize in enchiladas.
Good ass food but a bit Overpriced

I went the other day for lunch and the place is pretty good (really 4.5 stars).
I got the cornbread enchiladas, a unique concept in and of itself, with the red sauce.
The red sauce had a very mellow heat that didn't overpower the flavor and meshed well with the slightly sweet cornbread.
I will definitely be back to try some of the other menu items and support a local business that is churning out excellent food at reasonable prices.

What's not to love?
Amazing, fresh, unique food and friendly service.
I loved the cornbread enchiladas with red sauce.
Definitely go for the fried egg on top.
YUM.

Norm R. sent me an email back in May suggesting I check this place out.
Since it's in my neighborhood, I'd been driving by and waiting for it to open.
I was able to get in the first time in June.
We stopped in for a snack (my cousin had just arrived from NYC and was hungry - but we didn't want to eat too much, as we had dinner reservations in a few hours.
)  We did a fair sampling of the menu.
My cousin had enchiladas, I had tacos, and my sister had a salad.
I honestly don't remember who had which protein in which dish - but between the three of us, we had a nice variety.
All of us were content with what we had, and none of us had a difficult time navigating the menu.
Everything was fresh and tasty.
Not the most amazing food I've ever had - but it's quick, fresh and affordable.
And I think it's a few steps above Chipotle in both flavor and personality.
I've been in a couple times since then, and have always been happy with my selection.
The food always hits the spot.
Good stuff!
Just hoping they expand to soups - plural.
I'd like to see more than chicken tortilla offered.

Innovative concept, surprising variety of menu options and fresh ingredients.
It is a couple more bucks per person than Chipotle or Q-Doba but definitely worth it.

Hesitantly tried a cornbread enchilada and I must say it was surprisingly delicious.
The verde chicken was just okay but the sauces guac & melted cheese made everything better!
I'll be back to try out more stuff!

Chipotle meets enchiladas!
What a great idea.
I was so excited to try this place and I'm glad Amy H convinced me to get out of the office for lunch!
My food was pretty good, but I don't think I picked the right combination... and I definitely didn't pick the right salsa... it was smoking hot and I had poured all over my enchiladas which made the tops of them virtually inedibile.
I'm definitely going to go back and hope to upgrade it 4 stars with better combinations.
Something to keep in mind, I am not a big eater, but I feel like the portions were really small.
My giant would have been starving, and could easily eat a double order.
Maybe it was because I'm a vegetarian.... Also, if you go at lunch... parking is tricky!

My husband and I were on our way home from Vegas, and we decided to stop in Phoenix for lunch.
We intended to go to another restaurant, but I stopped when we drove by Gadzooks.
I didn't even have this place bookmarked, but I remembered hearing about it in the New Times.
I'm glad we came after the lunch rush because I might have frozen up from all the choices.
I went with the spinach/mushroom and potato enchiladas on the corn/flour tortillas and topped them with green sauce, pickled onions and guacamole.
I like that they are broiled right in front of you so they're still piping hot at your table.
The tangy green sauce was great, and I liked both fillings, especially the sinful potatoes.
My husband got three different meat tacos; his favorite was the bison.
The tortillas don't really hold up for tacos, though.
His started falling apart after a few bites so he ended up eating them as enchiladas.
I'm more than ready to go back and try more of the options.

Really good food.
Clean.
Cheap.
Friendly.
Win.

Good food but not worth the wait nor cold food.
Been here once and I was not impressed w/ how inefficient the staff operated.
The take out is served in a Aluminum container w/ wrapping paper and strings as a lid.
Took about 30 minutes to get through the short line and by the time I got home my food was cold.
Food was def over priced.

This place is fantastic!
Food is always as fresh as can be, served in piping hot dishes and so filling.
Great beer selection in bottles and the chips and gauc are do die for.
I will be coming here for a long time ...Did I hear franchise??

I was excited to see an enchilada and soup shop open.
Soup... not soups... they only serve one kind.
The food is flavorful but the process is difficult.
The staff appear grungy and have no sense of urgency.
It's concerning they don't wear hair nets.
One of the employee's pants had grease stains and the t shirts on the gals were grossly form fitting.
Just not what I expect when someone is making my food.
I've been twice.
Once when they opened and again a few weeks ago.
Both times they were out of something on the menu.
The concept of a string tying machine is interesting but completely a waste.
It almost seems as though they rushed to open and skipped on important details.
I truly hope the owner reads these reviews because the food is good and the place has such potential.
It seems like there are too many employees on shift which makes for a complete social hour.
I drive by every day and am starting to see an empty parking lot.
I hope the owner acts on just a few of these issues.
It would be a shame to see this place close needlessly.
PS...
It appears another taco shop is opening up across the street.
Please take action and make it easier for patrons to support local business.

Been meaning to try this place for a while now.
So glad we finally did!
Great food for a great price and so many options!
You can mix up the fillings or get extra on the side for only a buck.
The chicken was juicy and delicious.
We will be back...and soon!

Don't get me wrong, the Enchiladas are very good, but the menu item I will dream about is called Linda's Homemade tortilla soup.
Now as some may know, I am a soup lover.
This soup is more like a spicy chicken soup, although I think you can choose any meat to add that's on the menu.
Topped off with a bit of Jack cheese and crema and you have yourself quite a meal for $3.95.
Be advised, they get busy for lunch and you may wait awhile.
Service has always been friendly as expected.

I have to say I was quite pleased with my first visit to Gadzooks.
Had the tortilla soup with chicken as well as a bag of chips and salsa.
The soup was quite hardy and the chips were excellent.
I'll definitely be returning soon.
The only thing that looks like a challenge might be the parking on a busy Friday night, but I went at 9:30 when they seem to be winding things down.

I love enchiladas.
They are my favorite Mexican food.
When I saw this place - I thought "What?
An enchilada-only place?
" I think it blew my mind.
Coming from NYC, should expect the "specialty" restaurants that specialize in one type of food only (e.g.
Mac and cheese, meatballs, etc.
) but in Phoenix?
Anyway, a friend and I stopped there on a whim.
I was not surprised, but amazed at how good this was.
The concept is really "line" style - (read: Subway) where you pick your tortilla, then your meat, then your toppings and slide on down.
I ordered 2 enchiladas.
First, the tortillas.
I did the half wheat/half corn.
They are super soft and chewy, with a soft texture.
Next, the chicken and then the cheesy potato fillers.
Both delicious.
Gadzooks offers two vegetarian options: one is potato/cheese for the filler and the second is spinach.
Then the topping - green salsa please.
Some cheese on top - and into the oven it goes to warm up and crisp up the cheese on top.
Just like a pizza.
The last time I was there - I tried the tortilla soup.
I love tortilla soup - in all kinds and types.
This was rich and perfectly seasoned.
I will definitely get it again.

As a veg my review may contrast others.
This place is a chipotle of enchiladas.
Pick your tortilla filling(s) and toppings.
For the veg crowd there are 3 ish choices, spinach and mushrooms (good concept but need a bit more flavor and mushrooms), pepper jack potatoes and corn bread.
I have only tried the former two to date.
For sauce there is only 1 veg option the green.
top it with some cheese, melt it and then some salsa and slaw.
Looks great.
The down sides are 1. lines quickly form as the melting of the cheese becomes a bottle neck 2.
The taste is nothing special the green sauce and the soft tortillas makes this remind me of an Amy's dish 3.
I was still hungry afterwards  Give it a try and see if it is your thing, for me my ~7 can be spent elsewhere.

First of all I hate giving local businesses bad reviews but after going to this place twice I had to review it.
I know they are not known for their nachos but I love nachos and when I was told they had good nachos I wanted to try it asap.
The first time I got chicken nachos.
They were covered in Chicken.
I could not taste the chips, cheese, guac, because it was just all chicken.
They give few chips.
Literally I picked off a pile of chicken on a plate and I still had more than I knew what to do with in the nachos.
I kind of wrote the place off because the nachos were almost inedible.
Then comes tonight.
I was craving nachos again.
They are so close that I figured I would give it another shot and just get them vegetarian this time.
Again they were skimpy on chips, when I said no meat they did not offer any beans or anything to substitute the beans.
So I got the guacamole again which they charged me extra for.
When I got the total I asked if I was charged the same as with meat and the unsmiling person ringing me up said yes.
Not only did I get charged the same as I would have with a pile of meat on my nachos but they charged me extra for guac!
A few chips and some cheese should not cost 9 dollars.
I can go to Tico's and get vegetarian nachos with veggies, beans, guac, etc for a similar price and they are twice as large.
The cheese was completely hard and there was more pico than chips.
Really unimpressive.
They could learn something from chipotle and give the vegetarians their guac for free if they are going to charge them for the meat they are not eating.
Never again.

Outstanding food.
Extremely friendly and helpful staff.
Very clean and modern looking.
I highly recommend you try this new establishment out.

With a movie under our belts, it was time for nourishment.
What better place to so that than Gadzooks?
This being our first time, I wasn't fully sure how to order, but with some assistance from the very friendly staff, we were able to get what we wanted.
I ordered the green chile pork, red sauce and mixed cheeses.
After a brief heating in their flaming oven, I had the hot (not the lava) salsa added, along with the crema.
While I found the meat to be a little on the dry side, all the flavors popped wonderfully.
It's just the right size portion to fill you up without stuffing you.
I'll be back to eat my way through the menu.

This place has been open for about a few months and I haven't been here until yesterday.
WOW!
This is some good food for not a whole lot of money.

Uugh.
I too hate giving local businesses bad reviews, but the food there was simply terrible.
I ordered tacos and they served them up enchilada style.
I mean it was actually funny that all they had to do is give me tacos and instead they plunked massive amounts of cheese over these tacos and served them up enchilada style!
So I tried to eat them, and truthfully even if they just served me the tacos the food tasted terrible and it was overpriced to boot.
Finally, I know this is terrible to say, but the server girl in line had so many piercings on her face and in her nose it was kind of disgusting.
I get that people want to express themselves with piercings, but when I'm buying food from you, I don't want to see metal drooping out of your nose.
Just saying...

Super fresh food but the line is too long for a quick-service restaurant and ordering my food was kinda a hassle because the menu is like over your head; it's hard to see.
It's like they tried to copy Chipotle but offer better quality food.

Love this concept!
I think I could seriously eat enchiladas at least once a week and Gadzooks makes we want to eat them here.
The cornbread and potato enchiladas were amazing...unique options and super flavorful.
The staff was very friendly and helpful with recommendations, the patio was pet friendly and the prices are ridiculously reasonable.
They told me today that they won best chicken taco this weekend at the AZ Taco Festival, so you definitely want to check this place out!

This is a great place to go either by yourself or with one other person.
Somewhat difficult to order and sit with a group, especially when the restaurant is busy.
Food is really really good, though.
I got 2 enchilads with the green chile pork, red sauce, over easy egg, and guac.
Definitely worth the additional cash, I t hink.
Overall the atmosphere of this place is decent.
It's like the chipotle of enchialada places which is nice.
Nothing that sets it apart, really.

Awesome Amazing service Starving and this place made me smile Got the two enchilada one with green chile pork the other with short rib And their chicken with corn bread taco This place exceeded all expectation

I just went here tonight and I do not know why I haven't been here before!
The place was really inventive with the fillings for the enchiladas.
They had corn bread and mashed potatoes and short rib and all kinds of deliciousness.
I got enchiladas like I've never had before.
Short rib and mashed potato with christmas style sauce (red and greed), a fried egg, slaw, pico, cheese, ohhh my, it was delicious.
Also got the guac, which was wonderful!
I got two enchiladas and still have plenty left for lunch tomorrow.
I will definitely be back!!
(I had a taste of the cornbread...and I need more!

After my initial experience here, the most immediate question in my mind is how well capitalized are their investors?
To the uninitiated Gadzooks appears to have been created to be as much a Chipotlé spinoff as possible.
From the hip, industrial design of the interior to the simplified menu options.
They've also borrowed Chipotlé's basic "build your own"  menu format.
Except rather than burritos - it's enchiladas... And as an afterthought soup.
While Chipotlé's menu is easy and intuitive, Gadzooks offers a 7 step choose your own adventure book accessed only by reading the most awkwardly placed chalkboard in restaurantdom.
The enchilada was bland.
The service seemed to be working awfully hard for so few guests.
The atmosphere was stylish but cramped.
I think these guys set out with a good idea, let's hope they have the capital to fix their fundamentals and get back on track.

I finally made it to the place tonight and was pleasantly surprised!!
The concept is similar to chipotle but still has its own unique experience.
The staff was very helpful and knowledgable of their products and would recommend this place to anyone.

First time visit and I Really enjoyed this place.
Specialty beer, outdoor seating, fresh delicious food.
I definitely will be back!

Check out this hipster spot!
The Enchiladas are not your whole in the wall variety.
You can customize the inside, outside, and aroundsides on this bad boy.
Great concept, great food.
Can't wait to go again.

Gadzooks Enchiladas & Soup           "Just wasn't for me"   Gadzooks is a create-it-yourself restaurant with a hip and trendy vibe.
Gadzooks offers enchiladas, tacos, chopped salads and house made tortilla soup.
The staff at Gaszooks is accommodating, friendly, personable, and knowledgeable about the products they provide.
The atmosphere is stylish but very cramped.
I guess I was really expecting more, considering all the positive reviews I read and this is why I feel terrible for saying the food at  Gadzooks was bland and poorly executed.
On my first visit to Gadzooks I had the two enchiladas meal.
First you select a bread.
I choose corn tortillas,  Next it was time to select a meat.
I  went with the braised short ribs.
After you select your meat your ready to add the enchilada sauce.
I choose the "Christmas" red and green,  two distinct sauces.
Then your creation is topped with cheese, and  there are a few cheeses to choose from.
I tried the Chihuahua Cheese.
The medium size deep dish is then placed into a brick oven to bake.
I added a few extras like Uncle Rico's pico and scratch made crema.
To be honest the food just wasn't good.
The enchiladas were bland and soupy.
Even tho Gadzoooks offers numerous toppings, I think less is better.
The enchiladas seem to be covered with as much cheese and sauce as possible and this took away form the flavor of the meat.
Gadzooks wasn't the worst food nor the best, just disappointing.
However ending on a positive note I LOVED their chips.

Wow, amazing food.
Tell them what you want and that's what you get.
The Enchiladas are put together to your taste and the lava was for real.
Parking lot is too small and seating is a bit on top of eachother, so come early or take a late lunch.

Though I am neither a vegetarian nor gluten-intolerant, I do have family and friends that are.
While neither of those specific family or friends were with me on this particular evening, the person in line infornt of me was gluten-intolerant and the person in line behind me was a vegetarian.
I was very impressed how when they each explained their dietary restrictions to the person helping them that each staff member knew exactly what that customer could and could not have and explained their menu items and what was in each, down to which items were made with chicken stock (which I've noticed some people don't seem to realize that just because there are no chunks of meat in something, that if made with an animal stock is NOT vegetarian).
It's nice to see a business properly and thoroughly train their employees about their food beyond the information needed to be provided the majority of its customer base.
Gadzooks realizes that the majority is not the entire customer base and has accomodated those with other dietary needs with a place to go and eat at with the assurance that they are infact able to enjoy their food without fear that the person helping them gave them false information.

Wife and I took the kids to lunch.
Fantastic food at decent price.
Three enchiladas, each different meat.
Will definitely go back.

Good food fun vibe.
Bison and short rib enchiladas, very good.
Lava sauce actually hot!!
Bueno Buebo.
Small parking lot but a must try.

I love coming here.
The food is fresh and good and you can get in and out in 20 minutes (usually......not at lunch though, it is packed).
My favorite is the enchilada stuffed with a corn bread........it is so friggin good.
The guacamole is excellent and I usually hit this place up at least once a week.

Great food.
It's got flavor and it tastes fresh.
It was the perfect lunch on a cold and rainy day.
I had three enchiladas with green and red sauce and some fantastic habanero sauce.
Did not leave disappointed and hope to come back soon.

So creative and delicious!
Goat cheese and cornbread in an enchilada?
Yes, please!

Despite rave reviews from other Yelpers and friends, I found my Gadzooks experience tonight fairly average.
Now, my choices were more limited as a vegan, but I was looking forward to the spinach-mushroom tacos.
I topped them off with Pico de Gallo and guacamole.
We also ordered the chips with the roasted Roja salsa.
The corn tortillas were outstanding and held up so well to the filling.
I found the sauteed spinach-mushroom combo to be okay, not anything too flavorful.
The guacamole needed something more, in my opinion.
If I am going to eat guacamole while visiting AZ, I have high expectations.
I thought it was bland.
The chips were also okay.
So, my meal was good but nothing that would bring me back in a hurry.
I will say the enchiladas looked delicious.
Worth a try if you are in the area, especially for cheese and meat lovers.

It took me a while to get in, because the name was somewhat deceiving.
What is GadZooks?
And what does it have to do with Enchiladas?
I still don't know, but after a few recommendations I have it a try.
I have since been back a few times.
Despite its odd name, GadZooks is like a chipotle for Enchiladas.
You basically pick out your filling (from about 8 choices), sauce, and then condiments (ie cheese, lettuce, Guac).
Staff then cook it in the oven and send you on your way.
I'm also a fan of the pumpkin cookies they have been serving during the fall.
I haven't yet tried any of the soups, but the enchiladas were tasty.
Another note- this isn't exactly authentic Mexican food, and chiles are very mild (to set proper expectations).

Get beyond the name and they may have something here.
It's a great play off of the build to order service ie Chipotle etc, but instead of burritos it's enchiladas.
I love the idea, but was a little disappointed by the descriptions of ingredients, ambiance and service.
I think there should be a little more info on the sauces/salsa's.
Might be a little helpful for those going for the first time.
The place itself is a little stark or cold feeling.
Maybe somewhat picky, but me and gf both thought the place felt weird.
The service was sub par.
The soup that was ordered was forgotten about and instead of reheating it because it sat on the counter they just served it to us cold.
The upside is that this place is a great idea and good food here.
The flour/corn tortillas are delicious and meat is tender and seasoned well.
We will give another shot and update the review.

Very cool concept!
Chipotle style enchiladas, but with much more creative offerings.
I came here for dinner tonight with my husband and I decided on the tortilla soup, and my husband ordered the enchiladas.
I chose the short rib as an added option which was fantastic, very juicy and flavorful.
The soup had a ton of vegetables and herbs in it and was quite filling.
My husband went with a spicy cornbread stuffing enchilada, and a green chile pork with white cheese, red sauce, and sour cream.
The cornbread had a similar flavor as a tamale, I couldn't stop stealing bites of this one.
I really like how you can customize your order and there's plenty of options if you want to go dairy free or vegetarian.
It was also very reasonable, dinner for 2 was $15!
I will definitely return.

I had heard great things about this place and was so excited to try it.
Soooooo glad that I did.
:)  The decor of the place is simple but there is a nice patio seating area so that you can enjoy the weather.
I think I was a Pavlovian dog, while waiting in line to place my order.
I chose two enchiladas one with pork green chili and the other a potato and cornbread mixture.
Smothered in a green chili sauce and baked to perfection.
Definitely add the fried egg on top, it makes everything taste yummy.

Food wasn't bad.
Somewhat salty.
The cashier was straight rude.
I ordered Tortilla Soup when I got to the cashier and she annoyingly informed me that I should of ordered it at the beginning with my enchiladas.
She then asked me what I want in my soup.
I asked her what were my choices.
She said that it was everything on the line.
Again, she was rude and annoyed.
I told her to forget it.
I'll try it again but if they are rude again I probably won't go back

Went in for lunch and got two tacos - one chicken, one pork.
The menu is a little confusing and you're stuck gaping at the chalkboard on the ceiling while the workers stare at you, which is weird and not too flattering.
I'd much rather have the choices on the glass in front of the toppings and myself or a menu on the side wall, so I can just pick what I want down the assembly line without having to listen to the explanation of each.
I'm not a fan of Chipotle and didn't realize this is basically the same concept.
As mentioned in other reviews, they didn't bake the enchiladas (my mom's choice) very long.
I also had my tacos baked to melt the cheese which was a nice option.
The tortillas were VERY good (we got the lard mix), the meat was a good quality and tasty, I liked the cabbage mix also.
I added guacamole for $1 but it was little too spicy for me - most people would probably like it.
The tacos were STUFFED and overall really good.
I didn't try mom's enchiladas because she said the green sauce would be too spicy for me (I'm a wuss when it comes to spice, what can I say).
Two plates with a soda for just under $20.
Not the most cost effective lunch I've had, but seems pretty standard.
Would love the menu location change/expansion, longer oven bake time, and a way to buy those tortillas to go.

I've been to GadZooks a few times.
I go here when I want an enchilada that's got a little extra something.
I love being able to customize.
And they have an overwhelming number of options so I recommend going with someone who can suggest something to get you started.
(I need a lot of time to take in all the options which doesn't work if you're eating with other people.
) anyway I had the cornbread in my enchilada.
(It sounds a little weird but it's really really good!
) I've tried both the red mesquite sauce and the green sauce.
I thought the mesquite was too hot for me but it was really good if you like that.
I haven't had any issues with service.

I'm obsessed.
The handmade tortillas are what initially excited me.
I go back for the cornbread.
The cornbread stuffing is so dAAAlishus it angers me.
I don't like experiencing such deliciousness, as I want to make it last forever.
The tortilla chips are great!!
I'm a big fan of tortilla chips, and these chips make my top 3 list for the phoenix area!
Light, Fresh, crispy, savory.
The concept is great- a variant of Chipotle (where you pick your enchilada mix-ins in an assembly like fashion) but with greater character, authenticity, quality and savoriness.
The meats are flavorful and fresh.
The portions are hearty!
There's one employee who is so friendly and explanatory;  she walks us through the options.
She always makes it a pleasant experience (younger female with gauged ears- sorry for the lack of better description).
My only reservation: some of the salsas are a little too tangy for my taste.
I would love to see a hearty roasted molcajete salsa.

Arrgh, just when I kicked my Chipotle habit, this place comes along.
Some great tortilla soup, custom made enchiladas that come out of the oven piping hot.
Why didn't some one come up with this earlier?
My biggest gripe is the parking lot, not the easiest to negotiate a little parking lot on 7th street during prime rush hour but worth it.
Oh they have great snickerdoodle and Mexican wedding cookies for purchase right at the counter!

Similar to Chipotle, but on a local Phoenix mom n pops level, and with enchiladas instead of burritos.
I really like that it's local!
Pros: -Local -Simple decor with good ambiance -Fast friendly and helpful service behind the counter.
-Plenty of choices to fill and and top your 'lada  Cons: -The menu is way above your head on the wall and hurts your neck to read it.
-Maybe too many choices and somewhat confusing what to add and when to add it.
-Food tastes decent,nothing special, not terrible but all kind of tastes the same.
We had four ladas with four different meats, sauces, and toppings and couldn't really taste much difference between the four.
I would probably give this place another shot, but maybe try tacos and soup next time.

Chipotle meets gourmet enchiladas.
That's what is going on... and I like it.

The little lady and I have been to Gadzooks numerous times, and we love it.
It is one of central Phoenix's gems, and if nothing else, it is the best Mexican food at this particular intersection (those of you familiar with the intersection will know what I'm referring to).
It's funny, every time we go it takes us a few minutes to figure out what we want.
The staff is always quick to offer to explain how things work and discuss any recent changes on the menu.
I want to tell then we have been before, but they are so friendly, we just let them explain it.
The concept is pretty simple, it is Chipotle style enchiladas.
They also have soup, but we haven't had it so I can't vouch.
The enchiladas are excellent.
The yukon gold sounds odd (a potato enchilada?
), but I crave them like a fat kid craves cake.
I am also partial to the short rib, and pork.
Others are good too, but I can (or at least should) only eat three per sitting so this is my typical order.
We prefer the green sauce, but we usually do.
The slaw is awesome too, gives the food a little crunch.
Everything just depends on our mood, customize and enjoy!

My new favorite spot for quick mexican food!
I have always had a hankerin' for enchiladas, and these WILL NOT DISAPPOINT.
On my first go I got 1 each of chicken, short ribs, and a pork carnitas.
Man they where good, not even good but exceptionally great.
If you want a quality meal in under 5 minutes check this place out!
Try the pickled onions, might sound kinda gross but they work sooooo well IMO!

The short: The sauces/salsas and soup were too salty for me, some of the seating was tight, and the ordering process was a bit confusing or overwhelming for new customers, but the fillings were really delicious--extra kudos for offering several tasty vegetarian options.
The long: If you're new, I recommend you stand back, look at the giant overhead menu, and formulate a game plan before you walk up to the counter, because once you do, you walk under the menu so it's out of sight.
You have to be quick, too, because the only place to view the menu without being in the way is just inside the door.
I wish the menu were along the back wall so it could always be in sight.
Every dish is built the same way, even the soup, which is why I was confused when the toppings I requested in my enchiladas started to be piled on top of my soup.
We ended up getting a bowl of soup with green chili pork shoulder on top (I'd meant for it to go into the enchilada and couldn't stop them in time before they plopped it on top of the soup) and four enchiladas: guajillo braised short ribs, sauteed spinach mushroom, smashed jack potato, and cornbread in corn tortillas.
All of these fillings were amazing--flavorful, clean, fresh, and filling.
The pork shoulder and cornbread were my favorites.
The pork was so, so tender and moist--probably one of the best savory bites I've had in a long time.
We tried both the red and green sauces and the pico and salsa verde.
This is where the salt shriveled my tongue, pickled my guts, and hardened my arteries.
The soup was also way too salty for me, and I couldn't finish it.
I got a fried egg on top of my enchiladas, and that was a bit salty, too.
For the most part, I was glad the tortillas protected the fillings from the sauces because I ended up just prying into them and eating the fillings about halfway through.
My boyfriend agreed that it was pretty salty, but he managed to finish most of his meal and didn't say it was too salty to finish.
Honestly, I want to say it was just my taste buds, but it was the saltiest food I can remember eating.
As for the ambiance, it's all right.
Plain furniture and walls, brightly lit, and thankfully no loud music, but the chairs, especially near the window, were tight.
After I sat down, someone sat down behind me and trapped me in so I had to scoot out sideways because I couldn't even turn around to ask him to let me out.
I'd aim for one of the tables down the middle of the room next time.
We finished off by splitting a glazed pumpkin cookie--tender and cakey, and one I'd definitely eat again.
I do want to try them again, but until I know if either my taste buds or their kitchen were just off or I've just gotten too sensitive to salty food, I think I'll just top my stuff with cheese and get some salsa on the side.

My family enjoyed a really yummy dinner here!
The tortillas are delicious, the rib meat stuffing was great and my dad's favorite.
My daughter loved the pork.
I had the rib meat, yum, and loved the mild red sauce.
I'm quite a wimp and appreciated that this had flavor without frying my tongue.
A little fresh crema and cheese mellowed it out perfectly.
In an odd twist, they had pumpkin spice cookies with brown sugar frosting on the counter.
At first I thought, what an odd choice after enchiladas.
Turns out they were insanely good and very good after enchiladas!
Apparently I am old and I say things like "it's too noisy in here"... because it was a bit.
The only menu is up way high so I just got a general idea of what I wanted and asked a lot of questions.
The staff was great and didn't seem to mind.
Everyone in the family really did enjoy the meal - we were the clean plate club.
Next visit, I am getting my own spinach and mushroom enchiladas.
And, I must confess, another cookie :-)

Enchiladas just the way you want them.
Line was a bit slow (lunch rush) but the food was great!

This is a great little place offering an interesting take on the enchilada.
Ordering is pretty much Chipotle-style, where you pick out your ingredients and toppings.
However, the quality of the food far surpasses Chipotle, Cafe Rio or other similar places.
There are several ways to customize your enchilada, meats, sauces, cheeses and vegetarian fillings.
You can also order a Poblano pepper stuffed with anything you want and served up enchilada style - absolutely delicious.
They even have the option of throwing a fried egg on top, which is a must if you're looking for an authentic Southwest enchilada.

Amazing!
Excellent value.
The enchiladas are delicious.
I didn't know they were fully customizable, but they are.
You can't really go wrong with any of the choices.
As for soup, there is only one kind of soup, but it's as customizable as the enchiladas.
I'll definitely be back.

I had here what I think, in my humble opinion, was the most authentic and delicious gourmet enchilada plate I've had in my life.
I grew up in Mexico and tried the lot.
I've had from curb-side to high-end restaurants.
This was quite a treat and this place takes the gold.
For a quick bite to eat I always resorted to stop at chipotles which was my favorite, until now.
This place elevates Mexican food to a whole new level.
The place has a similar feeling to chipotles, very rustic.
You can see the pots and pans being used to cook delicious meats that probably had been simmering all morning before opening.
All the ingredients are fresh and they taste fresh.
Crema from scratch?
When a business is taking their time to make something as basic as crema fresca from scratch, you know you will not to be disappointed.
Enough with the talk.
I encourage you to give this place a go.
I know they have tacos and salads but they are a dime a dozen in this city.
Not saying by this they are not as good, but good enchiladas are hard to find.

Service is rough.
Went there today around 1pm with a coworker and there were only 3 people in line but we were in there 30 min (and our order was to go!).
I didn't get anything because they were out if chicken, from what I overheard they run out certain food items often.
Anyways, no one greeted us.
We stood in front of two people making tortillas for 5 min and they didn't even acknowledge us.
I understand if this is your role but one could at least smile and greet us.
When my coworker was trying to pay, a staff member opened the cash register to exchange their tip money and made us wait while they counted their tips before cashing us out.
Afterwards the cashier wrapped up my coworker's  food that had just been sitting there for a few min, meanwhile other staff continued to stand around and act like they hated their lives.
They also kept asking my coworker "is this your food?
" When you basically only serve enchiladas its hard to tell the plates apart, you think they would pay attention to whose food is who's.

I've literally eaten here 4 times this week.
It's a little expensive, ($22 for 5 enchiladas, an egg and two drinks), which is why I am stuck on giving it less than 5 stars.
But otherwise, I think it could be worth the money considering how unique and customizable it is.
I don't know, I just want everything to be free, so I'm at like 4.5 stars on this one...
Anyway, the food tastes great.
Really unique, authentic options.
I really recommend the red sauce, corn tortillas, pork, chicken, an over-medium egg, slaw, jalapeno ranch and cotija cheese...that's what I ALWAYS get.
They have really good chips and salsa, too.
The staff is friendly.
My only complaint is that there are SO many options, that I think they could benefit from having labels on the glass telling you what everything is, that way you don't have to stare straight up and get lost on the menu and waste their time, but they do a good job of explaining it anyway.
Still, I like doing things myself instead of asking the same dumb question every time.
They serve in their own little wood-fired ceramic bowls which is cute and unique, too.
They said they don't like hearing "this is kinda like Chipotle!
" so I will say this place is better than Chipotle, but very similar :)  They serve enchiladas, chopped salads, stuffed poblano peppers and have other specials.
Take all of my money, Gadzooks.
You are so yummy.

We enjoyed a great lunch there yesterday on their patio.
Ordering was difficult with the menu boards over your head but the staff was a great help with the dozens of options.
The food was full of flavor, filling and  reasonably priced.

Booooooommmbbbbb!!!!!!
Almost the same idea as chipotle being an American "Mexican" restaurant!

This place is so fun!
I live in the east valley and my friend lives on the west side, so we love to find places to meet in Phoenix.
This was the perfect spot.
I tend to ask a million questions and the staff was more than happy to explain  anything and everything to me!
I also love that they have red cream soda.
It might look exactly like Chipotle but the flavor and quality is way better!
Perfect Saturday afternoon lunch place.

Great concepts.
The process is fairly fast considering the product they are delivering.
We will back here over and over.
I would expect this to be franchised and everywhere fast.

Love this place!
Great prices, great quality and delicious food.
If only they had the 100 flavor soda fountain, it would be perfect.
So many choices and perfect size portion.
Can't wait to come back and try other ingredients.

Wow.
Woweeeewow.
Fresh, flavorful, fast, reasonably priced.
Yes!
Are you that kind of person that doesn't like just one thing on your plate - but likes to sample many things and take a bite of each thing over and over going round the plate til you're done?
ME TOO.
Gadzooks is a dream for you and I!
So many inside filling choices, so many topping choices, so many salsa choices...
I basically tried everything and it was all amazing, and there are lots of veg friendly options including an outstanding corn bread filling that sounds weird but is so creamy and tasty you'll go nuts.
And the tortillas are awesome which is a necessity.
I pretty much want to order another round and just spend the day here.
Don't judge me you'd want to, too, if you were here.

Excellent quality food and service.
My enchiladas were amazing and I can't wait to go back.
Highly recommended.
The bison is excellent.

Good stuff!!
Unique flavor.
Quick service.
Definitely worth a try!

Not your typical Mexican enchilada.
Food is good, great customer service and looks a clean please for a nice conversation.
Prices are very reasonable around $7 per person.

This is a delightful place if you don't want chain style food.
There is a place for chain restaurants, but I like to find a place that can be whatever the owners want because it is an independent.
They have more control over what they buy so you hopefully you should be able to expect better quality for the food you meal is made from.
Gadzooks doesn't disappoint in this area.
I went in there this afternoon more to look to the menu than to eat.
All of us have had one of those weeks where you are tired but have just enough energy to do something you've been meaning to do for what seems forever.
That was my day.
When I got in there I found a very creative menu, almost more than I wanted to deal with.
With the people being s welcoming and the restaurant so clean I decided to go for it.
†ruthfully, I let them recommend things and told them to use their judgement on them They had a lot of interesting choices to make from the tortillas to the cheeses to the condiments.
Once I sat down and ate, I guess I got some of my energy back because I started considering how I could have changed things from the many interesting ingredients that were available.
Next time, I will make it a real adventure to put together my meal.
Go and have fun here...definitely not your chain Mexican food.
II think it would be a great place to take a group and find out how many different combinations people could end up at the same table.
There is seating outside for people who enjoy that.
The cornbread tacos stood out for me!

Another fabulous find on Yelp!
The tortilla soup is the best I've ever had and worth the drive all by itself.
But- everything else looked so good that next time I'll have to skip the soup and get to the enchiladas.
Don't skip this gem!

This place is amazing.
I've been here twice and was surprised both times at how much meat they give you.
The short ribs are excellent and the guacamole is perfect.
My only problem with this place is the girl behind the counter who talks way too loud.
She's been there both times I've come for lunch.
I get that it's noisy back there, but no one else behind the counter talks nearly as loud as she does and I hear them fine.
I'm not letting this affect their rating though, since the food is worth it.

A coworker and I stopped in here for lunch today after hearing about it from a friend.
The parking situation was pretty rough but after circling the block once or twice we got a spot.
Right off the bat I noticed the authentic vibe of the place and the menu was super unique.
Of course I got the enchiladas as did most of the patrons as far as I could tell.
They let you customize the ingredients from the stuffing to the cheeses to the salsas and toppings.
They also bake the enchilada right there in front of you once they make it.
I ended up getting the spinach mushroom stuffing and it was absolutely delicious.
I really want to give a five star but the prices and parking bring it down to four...for now.
I will definitely be back.

The other day I was mentioning to my sister that I like enchiladas, but they're usually so badly done that I never order them.
I then saw her eyes light up and she yelled, "Gadzooks!
" As I began to slowly back away she told me about this terrific spot she likes to go for lunch and how I *had* to go there.
Initially I was hesitant-especially after she mentioned the Chipotle-style ordering method- but after a long day at the ballpark I really just wanted something quick, good and cheap.
So, I begrudgingly went in a bit skeptical, but I came out a huge fan.
Enchiladas:  Tortillas- Gadzooks offers two tortillas: corn or their "half n' half" mix (a combo of corn and flour)--both are made in house right in front of your eyes.
I got the half n' half on mine and it was terrific; good corn flavor with the softness you crave from flour tortillas.
5*  Filling- I got three different fillings: Green Chile Pork, Guajillo Short Rib, and Chile Cornbread mix.
Oddly enough, I thought the Cornbread mix was phenomenal; it was sweet and spicy and gave a nice contrast to the richness of everything else in the dish.
The Short Rib was my number two pick, but the cornbread kicked ass.
5*  Toppings- This is the cheese and salsa portion of the enchilada.
They have your typical red and green salsa or you can "Christmas" it and get 1/2 of each--of course I Christmas'd it!
Surprisingly, I'd have to say I preferred their green sauce, but if I came back I'd probably just Christmas it again.
I also got a combo of their two cheeses: Asadero and Chihuahua and it was all good.
4.5*  Add-ons: Gadzooks has some cool stuff you can throw on top after your enchilda is done cooking; they have Guacamole, over-easy Egg and Goat Cheese.
I opted for the Guacamole -I'm from Calli; you know how we do it!- but I'm really curious about the egg.
5*  Toppings part 2 (The Revenge!
)- A second helping of Salsa and Cheese?!
¡Sí, por favor!
I kept it simple with the Pico de Gallo and some crumbled Cotija Cheese.
4*  Service & Ambiance- The staff on the night I went were all terrific and very helpful.
They'll let you sample away at anything you want so that you'll get your order perfect--so, don't be shy!
The first thing you'll notice as you enter Gadzooks is how clean and modern the place is--actually the first thing you'll notice is how delicious everything smells, but I was talking sight-wise.
There's indoor and outdoor seating and it feels very spacious, even though it kinda isn't.
5*   Value- Terrific value as you can get a 2 Enchilada plate for $6 or $8 for those of us that are feeling like little piggies.
The kids' meals are also value-priced at only $3.75!
5*  I think Gadzooks has earned a nice place in my heart and would definitely be in my weekly lunch rotation if I worked in the area.
Awesome service, great food and value pricing are hard to come by these days and the fact that it's a small locally-owned business just further endears it to me.
Highly, highly recommended!

Love the place.
Have been going at least once a week for the last two months.
Their enchiladas are amazing and the stuffed poblanos are out of this world.
Only downside is that they sometimes run out of the poblanos.
I learned to call ahead and make sure they'd have them on hand and they always will.
If you're a first timer it can be a little confusing but they're quick to help and explain.
Always a great experience!

Boom-Pop-Pow-Bam  Holy enchiladas Batman!
This is a nifty location, a funky idea, and yummy eats all thrown into a clay dish and roasted over a fire.
The menu is fun, great selection but controlled enough to do what they do exceptionally well.
Menu-drawn in chalk, not a unique idea I know but boy does it just fit this place.
You walk to the counter... Kinda like chipotle.
Pick your stuff, they cook it in the dish...
In the fire....
Right in front of you.
I had a chicken burrito with green chili and a side of con bread.... Oh sorry I'm from the south... Corn bread.
Man it was good.
Just a cool experience with a helpful staff and good food.
Nuff respect.
You should try it at least once.
Cuz cuz cuz I said so.
What's the worst that could happen?
I'm mean really.
An I'm out....s

Absolutely amazing.
Think Chipotle for enchiladas.
Nice patio, plenty of room inside.
The food is really amazing.
The prices are great.
If you're not in the area it's actually worth the trip.
I ordered 2 chicken enchiladas.
I'll be back to try the tacos!

Good food,and cheap!

Fun concept that works with the quality of the food they serve.
Enchiladas and tacos are primarily their forte.
The short ribs are smokey with some zip.
Chicken is light and mild but flavorful.
The selection of topping is original and the slaw is tasty.

Super concept and oh so good.
Delicious tortillas and amazing fillings.
Try the enchiladas.
Los of cheese and toppings.
Can't wait to bring others here

This place was great.
I spent a lot of time in the starbucks across the street doing homework and one day made the adventure across the street with my roommate and it was a great decision.
The set up is kind of like Chipotle but the quality of food is so much better and a great variety of flavor.
Check it out!

What a great concept and place to eat!
It was our first time visiting Gadzooks and didn't know what to expect.
We were greeted by Jessica who was so friendly and walked us through the entire process.
All of the staff there were so nice, helpful and friendly that I will be back because of their great service and good food!
Even the other customers were so nice, giving us advise on what to get!
We sampled many sauces and toppings!
We can't wait to visit again and try new combinations!

This is my favorite place in the world.
I'm talking about the best -- seriously, the very best -- enchiladas you will ever eat.
Made just the way you like them.
Smothered in good stuff, like wonderful pickled onions and some great cheeses.
All of it is lip smacking good.
And the idea for the place, the "make your own" kind of deal stolen from Subway, this is just really creative.
Good job, congratulations to the owner.
Someday I am going to stand out front with a big sign that says "You will love this food.
Try it" because I think someone has to let the world know about the magnificence of Gadzooks.
Read my reviews.
I'm a very critical restaurant reviewer.
I do not put up with slackers.
This place rocks.
[To the owner, my only suggestion is to put the "ear lady" in the back and not up front -- you'll attract more business.

Im rating this on a vegetarian stand point so for you meat eaters the experience will probably be different.
That being said, i also thought that the overall quality of the food is not so great.
For vegetarians there is only one filling option, sauteed spinach and mushroom and it is kind of like baby food in texture.
The red sauce has chicken broth init.
I got 2 corn enchiladas.
The enchiladas themselves were bland.
Ifi hadnt added extra quacomole, coleslaw, cheese, crema, and salsa to it, it would have been very boring.
Pretty much youre paying for the toppings.
If youre vegan you are even more limited.
You could only have salsa and guacomole and onions.
The chips and salsa though were really good.
I could have made a whole meal out of the chips.
The service was great.
The person serving me was very kind about taking me through it step by step and making sure i got vegetarian items.
So i wont be going back.
No point in paying for guacomole and salsa and cheese and chips and stuf when I could make that all myself or get it all from safeway or something in bulk for the same price.

Been wanting to try this place for awhile and finally got here for a 2pm lunch last week.
This is usually the time staff is eating, etc and it was just the case on this day as well.
The food is well priced and served up in big portions.
The short rib was extra cooked from probably sitting in the bin for awhile, but luckily I enjoy extra cooked and slightly dry beef so it worked out well for me.
The chicken was a runner-up to the beef, but I should have tried the cornbread.
If you go crazy with toppings and sauces (which you will on your first visit like I did) then everything gets lost under all the different flavors.
I would skip the half flour and half corn and go for the corn tortilla and be gentle on the sauces, but this is a place I will return too at some point if I"m in the area.

Food is great.
I wish they'd throw in some rice and beans to fill out the meal.
I always get the green chile chicken enchiladas with habenero on top.
They are quite delicious.
There are also good vegetarian options available.
I also wish there was a good enchilada and soup combo meal.
It's more of a pick one entree either or kinda thing.
I mean the name is enchiladas AND soup, not OR.
Also, the sneeze guard is awkwardly placed making it very difficult to hear the employees.
I guess I feel a little overly critical especially in light of the o so many positive reviews but  guess I can't help how I feel.
One more thing.
TIP: make sure you get the sour cream on the side unless you want a big white pool of melted liquid sour cream engulfing your enchilada.
The enchiladas are cooked in their plate leaving the plates very hot and they instantly transform a hearty clump of sour cream into liquid.
Update 7/29/2014: Seems as though they've worked out the kinks.
There is still quite a bit of a lunch rush so If you are pressed for time it might not be the best place to go but otherwise it's worth the wait.

Tried this place for the first time tonight and it was amazing!
Everything was flavorful and the staff was really helpful!
I will definitely go again.
And again.

Several reviewers mentioned that the spinach & mushroom filling is vegetarian.
If Aaron Pool makes it the same way that it's listed in the recipe he share with the Arizona Republic today, it is NOT VEGETARIAN (chicken stock).
I am shocked that several reviewers (who are vegetarians) seem to have had staff members steer them toward this option, despite the fact that it is NOT vegetarian.
Really?
Why not just use vegetable stock?
And if something seems veg, but is not, please tell your staff.
Here is the recipe that Mr.
Pool shared: http://www.azcentral.com/story/life/food/recipes/2014/04/22/spinach-mushroom-enchilada-filling/8013227/

Soooo freaking great!
Think chipotle, you choose an enchilada, taco, chopped salad or tortilla soup, add the homemade INCREDIBLE meat and extras and boom you've got an iron chefs version of chipotle for close to the same price!
And the grapefruit margarita was unreal!

First time ever going to Gadzooks and it was awesome.
The people were cool and friendly.
Ambience cool.
Loved the whole set-up.
Sunshine wonderful.
Patio great.
Oh, and that sangria is most definitely on point; so delicious.
I loved the enchiladas and the tortilla soup!
I have not one bad thing to say.
Will so be going back.
Also, I am a Gluten Free Chic ( mandatory, not by choice) and I had not one problem with the food.
So two jigs on that one : )   If you have not been here @ least try it once.
The food is very flavorful.

This is an amazing spot.
Love love love the chicken.
Quick but fresh, great dine in setting and patio as well.

First off let me preface by the fact that I am extremely lazy and don't normally review places, no matter how good it is.
With that being said I took the time out of my extremely unoccupied day to make this review.
That is how awesome this place is!
I have been here twice now, and the first time I ordered the green chili pork and short rib enchiladas.
The second time around I got both short rib.
The short rib has an amazing flavor, it just pops in your mouth!
The cotija cheese and habenero lava sauce are both fantastic.
This last time I even tried a side of the herbal ranch, which was, you guessed it, great!
I also tried a side of their cornbread this time around and was glad I did.
With actual corn and a hint of spiciness to it, it was a great addition.
To top off this great meal, they even have alcoholic beverages.
Pacifico being my favorite, I got that my first time through.
After which I realized he had a cream soda on tap, and boy do I love cream soda!
So this time around I got the cream soda, and my wife asked if they made margaritas.
Which they did, so she got one.
A pink grapefruit Margarita is what they served her, and it was very delicious!
A little too strong for my wife, but I didn't mind finishing off for her.
For under $30 for a family of three and one alcoholic beverage and one soda, I will gladly be coming back here on a regular basis!
I highly recommend this to anyone in the area or even if you have to make a bit of a commute.
Every Phoenician should try this place at least once.
Unless it's on a night I choose to go, in that case, go a different night.
Parking is very limited and I'd rather not park across the street... ;-)

Very nice people!
Very patient.
No attitudes here.
Usually the flavor of an enchilada stems from the meat, the sauce and cheese, but the tortilla flavor stands out at Gadzooks which is delicious and memorable (50/50).
I also appreciate the honest service.
I heard a server say to a patron in front of me that the red sauce by itself doesn't taste as good so it's better on the enchilada.
Again, nice people.
Worth the trip.
Worth the wait.
I'll be back!

Amazing, fresh, creative and friendly.
One of the best places to eat in Phoenix for a quick meal.
So good!

Holy salty food, Batman!
0_o  I had dinner here on Friday with my husband and toddler daughter.
It was packed, but not nearly as packed as the other restaurant that we attempted to visit and left because there wasn't enough space for us.
We waited in line for a few minutes and finally it was our turn to order.
I shouted my order to the employee on the other side of the counter; over the deafening din of other people who were talking and eating and all the kitchen noise.
It's very noisy when that place it busy!
I ordered 2 enchiladas with the 50/50 flour/corn tortillas and the short rib for the filling.
I chose green enchilada sauce and cheddar cheese as my topping with some Pico de Gallo and buttermilk dressing.
For my little I got her a carnita taco with a side order of the sautéed spinach and mushrooms and some of the same buttermilk dressing on her taco.
My husband ordered two enchiladas: one was spinach and mushroom filling and the other a cornbread filling.
He had the red sauce on his enchiladas.
At the register I added on a grapefruit margarita and a fountain drink for my husband.
We paid around $32 for everything.
The inside was packed, so we ate on the outside patio.
The patio was also very busy and every table was taken so we could only find seating at the counter that runs along the face of the patio wall.
It was difficult to keep a toddler perched high atop the barstool so that was a bit of a challenge, but the twilight temperature outside was really perfect so some of the hassle of sitting out there was worth it.
My grapefruit margarita was very tasty, but the food is a different story.
I like salt, I use a good deal of it in my normal cooking because as a Sonoran desert dweller we need it in our systems to survive, but I can hardly remember a time where I'd been to a restaurant and the food was so over-salted that I couldn't finish eating.
That was the case on this visit, my husband complained of the same thing, despite the fact that he was eating a completely different kind of enchilada than I was!
Our toddler only picked at her food too, I suspected it was also the sheer saltiness of it.
The buttermilk dressing on my enchiladas and my daughter's taco was outrageously salty, the green enchilada sauce across my food was crazy salty, the short rib filling was heavily salted and I think there was even salt in the Pico de Gallo too.
Seriously, whoever is in the kitchen at Gadzooks NEEDS to step away from the saltshaker, the saltiness of everything overpowered the different flavors of the dishes and it was over the top.
I'll try this place one more time and if that visit goes poorly then I'm done.
This is my second try to understand what everyone else sees in this place.

So I Went plain jane today.. Got 2 braised beef enchiladas with green sauce and of course cheese : )  Tried the mashed potatoes this time.
They most definitely should be on everyone's To-Eat List.
Very creamy till the last drop.. Nom Nom Portions are generous.. My 8 year old and I shared this... and were stuffed.

The food is good and the service was good too.
I ordered the short ribs and green chile pork enchiladas.
They both were good but I like the green chile pork the best.
They place reminds of chipotle but with enchiladas.
For real authentic Mexican food this might not be the place but it is still great option over Taco Bell.

Sometimes people ignore the food and review dumb things like chairs or noise level... we are here to EAT.
Stay home if you can't handle being out in public, troll.
Anyway, food was prepared quickly, affordable, and filling.
The salsa was good, the meat was not dry or over seasoned.
You really won't find food this good for the price point and speed.
I went a little crazy with the extras on the guac and Bison meat but it was worth the 2 bucks.

This place is delicious.
Lots of variety and sitting.
I ordered 2 Enchiladas 1green chili pork and 1 potato.
They covered it with Jack cheese and then placed it in a pizza oven so it would get hot and bubbly.
Then I dressed it with lettuce, pico, sour cream, and guac.
Got a side of chips too.
The chips are like the good ones you would get freshly made from a Mexican supermarket almost.
Everything was yummy.
Well priced around $8-$10 a person.
Only down fall was the line out the door.

I wish this place was closer to my house!
I think I would be there everyday!
I got 2 enchiladas with the 1/2 and 1/2 tortilla with one mashed potato and one with chicken!
I think I could of eaten a whole bowl of mashed potato.
They add either green or red, or even both sauces and cheese and put it in their brick oven and add some cabbage slaw!
Everything just tasted so fresh!
I will be going back very soon!

Decided to stop here after being severely disappointed by Americas taco shop down the street .. Let me just say this place took the cake simply amazing to say the least.
Everything tasted fresh and was bursting with flavor yet they has the speed of a chipotle .. We have been left in utter disbelief this is our new goto enchilada joint ..
Step aside nana you have competition...

One of my favorite spots.
I eat here more than I care to admit but the food is just SO freakin good.
Everything is full of flavor and is packed with homemade flare that keeps me going back for more!

AMAZING!!
I cannot write enough about how delicious this place is!
Went there for lunch and line was out the door!
SO worth the wait!
Everything is so fresh and flavorful!
It makes Chipotle look like the ugly step child!

Great, fast enchiladas.
It feels like the enchilada version of Chipotle.
But less corporate!

I love it here!
The food is always awesome.
I would suggest this place to everyone.
The corn bread filling is amazing.

Never been impressed with the food, been here a few times, will never go back.
And there's a girl behind the counter that talks LOUDER than anyone I have ever encountered.
Now whenever we hear a loud person we say 'The Gadzooks girl must be here".
Someone needs to tell her to stop screaming "PICO DE GALLO?!?!!
" before she scares off more customers.

MMMMMMMM I am a fan,....
The Green chili option is the way to go,..
The Bison wrapped in the Green Chili is the bee's knees!

Average joint.. was salty.. limited selection  Not really customer friendly

This place has incredible food!
it's an ingenious business concept that hopefully starts to branch out with more locations.
If you're looking for an affordable, mouthwatering, and convenient meal this is the place to be!

I went again..sure its a tad salty, service is sketchy and its a bit warm in the seating area..
But i this time order  1 beef taco 1 chicken/pork combo enchilada with green sauce,  side of mashed potatoes   Was surprisingly good the second time around!

I've been meaning to try this place for a while and finally stopped in and I'm glad I did.
The food was delicious and even as a big Chipotle fan there's so many options I feel like I could eat here multiple times a week and not get tired of it which sometimes happens for me at Chipotle.
I gave 3 stars for 2 reasons.
One -as a first timer its a little awkward to navigate their line.
The menu is so high up on a portion that extends above your head so you have to repeatedly step back to complete your order.
Also the staff was not very helpful considering they are a newer place and there's so many options.
Even when I go to Chipotle or Texas Roadhouse or Grimaldi's the first thing they ask is something along the lines of have you been here before etc.
I noticed the same treatment towards the other customers in line as well, maybe it was a bad shift but that definitely turned me off a little.
I'll be back for hopefully an experience as good as the food.

I was took here by a client of mine and didn't really know what to expect when we got there , but it was truy a slice of heaven I love Mexican food and hands down best tacos ever

Heard about this place from a podcast.
Walked up and thought the building looked great.
Walked in and felt like I was in Chipotle.
I ordered 2 chicken enchiladas, adding cheese, guacamole and cabbage.
It was great.
Me and my friends really enjoyed this place.
Very tasty.
Highly recommend it.

This place is the bomb!
Don't waste your time with mediocre food, bad service , and terrible music across the street at Taco Guild.
You'll spend half the money and double your pleasure.
I gave Taco Guild three tries, before giving up.
Came to Gadzooks today for the first time , and was super impressed.
Great concept .
I'll definitely be back.

So good!
I went here today for the first time with my friend.
I got two enchiladas (corn tortilla) one with short rib, the other with green chili pork.
I got half red sauce, half green sauce, with jack cheese.
I also got the sour cream type stuff on top.
They were both absolutely delicious, and I can't wait to come back!
The service wasn't the best I've ever had, but hey, I'm not going there to make friends, I'm going to eat delicious food!

Hello, would you like to know the secret of life?
If you worship at the temple of the almighty carb (which I am wont to do and really need to stop making a habit of), here you go:  Mashed potatoes.
Inside an enchilada.
I could basically stop there, because what the hell else do you need to know?!
But some more deets:  I ordered 2 enchiladas in their 100% corn tortillas (pressed in front of our own eyeballs!
), one filled with the mushroom/spinach mixture, one with the godly mashed potato filling.
I picked "Christmas style" (both red and green sauces) because WHY NOT!
Although I am an avid verde lover, so I think I'll go full on green sauce next time.
Asadero cheese.
Pico.
Picked red onion.
HEAVEN.
We split some chips/salsa/gaucamole on the side, because you might as well go all out.
The food was stupid, in the best way possible.
I like a little golden to my cheese (all pizzas/cheese-topped foods in my house get a 30 broiler blast at the last cooking minute), and was pleasantly surprised when my little 'lada bowl came out of their oven just like that.
Perfect!
The mixture of toppings was superb.
The only recommendation I can give is to perhaps put a label of what's what on the front see-through guard as people order.
There are a lot of fillings/toppings/salsas/extras and it was a little awkward to have to step back and look immediately above my head and strain to see all the details of what I could order.
If anything, it could make the employees' lives easier.
Last word: Pumpkin cookies.
Get them.
See how life changes for the better.

Food is great.
Love the fresh homemade tortillas.
And all the sauces there are amazing!
Love the potatoes they offer too.
Definitely a great place for lunch, does get pretty busy so I would recommend calling in your order if you are in a hurry.
I will be coming back again soon!

Decided to check this place out because of how cool the actual building looks when you pass by... lol.
I went with two friends for a girls luncheon and enjoyed the food!
As most of the reviews state, the staff was less than pleasant.
It was as if we annoyed them by being there.
It took an act of Congress to get her to smile or even look like she enjoyed her job.
Coming up to the counter was all business so know your order.
The short rib choice was SUPER oily... one of my friends was sick for the rest of the day.
But the Chicken and spicy cornbread mix was AWESOME!
I would recommend trying it because the food is good but if you are looking for great attitudes from the staff... skip it.

Absolutely addicting - so many options!
I think I ate there at least 4 times the week before I moved because I knew I would miss it so much!!!

OMG.
I hate reviews that start that way but it's the best I can do this place is awesome think of chipotle in its early years.
Fresh food great flavors and good prices.
Staff is friendly and very helpful in talking you through the process  will be coming back for more

Also:  it is a little intimidating/overwhelming on your first visit.
I stared at the menu board for about 2 minutes and was still undecided and somewhat confused,and  thats when the gal behind the counter asked if i had ever been there before and proceeded to very patiently and thoroughly explain the process and the options...that was very helpful.
Granted, there was no one behind me in line (i got there right as they opened).
By the time i left, the place was packed and there was a long line, so others may not have had the opportunity for full explanation as did i.
Just something to keep in mind on your first visit; its kind of like a crash course in a new language.. but worth the effort!

I just went today for the first time.
Really cool concept and the options you can add to your enchilada and tacos are a bit more interesting than Chipotle (not knocking Chipotle).
I will say that as a first timer, it's quite a confusing way to order as the signage is directly above you so you have to step out of line near the tables to see the boards.
The decor is pretty hip.
Had to sit outside b/c  there really aren't too many tables inside, so that made the experience a bit sour b/c it's so dang humid and hot today.
Overall a cool spot and I hope to be back.

Delicious enchiladas!
I saw all the great reviews for this place and had to give it a try, glad I did!
I'll be back for sure!

This place is very adorable and affordable!
It tasted great and was filling.
I recommend the sweet corn bread in a corn tortilla...
It was so flavorful and unique.
I will definitely be back!
Happy eatings :)

Mmmm.
Enchiladas have always been one of my favorite foods, and there's a Phoenix eatery solely devoted to cheese-filled tortilla bites of heaven: Gadzooks.
For those of us who always dreamed of an enchilada bar, Gadzooks makes those reveries come true.
The spot serves up just about any type of enchilada you'd like, as well as quesadillas, soup, tacos and salad.
The tortillas are freshly made, and the combinations are endless.
Fillings include chicken, pork, potato, bison, mushroom, short ribs and two types of cheese ($6.50-$6.75 for two tacos or two enchiladas), and then you get to douse your order in salsa, sauce, slaw and more.
You can order three, but two were plenty for me, and I left with a full, happy stomach.
The joint is order at-the-counter with a patio, and it's a really great alternative to Chipotle if you're looking for some new fast Mexican food.
They also serve sangria, margaritas and beer.

So damn good.
Best enchilada i've had in a while.
Oh the staff is SOOOO friendly and accommodating.
The product is great, like who else has Bison enchiladas?

Seriously, how have you lived your life so far in the Valley without knowing about this place???
Best.
Stuff.
EVER.
My mouth is watering now as I'm starting to write this... Those enchiladas... yum... After we discovered it, we've been religiously visiting it whenever we can get a day off, early in the morning and you really need to get in as soon as they open, because the place gets packed and line forms around 11.30... which is 30 minutes after opening.
Whatever special they have going on for the day, it's gone by 12... Soooo, yeah, get in early :D You won't make a mistake with whatever you try!
The ingredients that they use and have to offer are just great and fresh all the way.
And you can see them right there in front of you!
Do yourself a favor and get to it whenever you can!

Seating is in short supply here!
There are also no misters outside for summer seating.
Great flavorful enchiladas done Chipotle assembly style with a local Phoenix twist.
Multiple meat, cheese and sauce selections.
They are so great they allow you to mix and match!
I had the pork and chicken.
I loved the slaw add on, I don't see that often.
They also heat it up in a fire.
You also have two different style enchilada shells.
Staff is very helpful and guided me in my first time ordering.
I left with a hook up-enchilada style!
I'll be back soon.

